It's later revealed that this vision took place 10 days before Yeates went missing. She speculates further, saying "The girl wasn’t bosom friends with the men. It looked like they offered her a lift but she didn’t take it and they followed her". It looked like? Is a psychic giving rough details of something she saw in a vision of something which may or may not have been relevant, really good enough for a national newspaper front page? Apparently it is.
Jacki
Some other random thoughts as I contemplate the massive changes publishing is going to undergo in the next five years.
Newt Gingrich wants to be Superman.
On Monday night I applied Rimmel's double duty base coat, and two coats of essie's Splash of Grenadine. Tuesday morning I applied another coat of Splash of Grenadine, and then Depend's top coat.
The night version... slightly richer and I wear this over the Vital Light Serum. A delicious texture that doesn't feel too greasy or make the eyes puffy... An all round winner for me... Thank you Tish...
Billy Bob: Oh shit! I ‘member that, you were rocking her teeth like ACDC. Wasn’t her name Claire?
I don’t have a cute little story as to why I made these. I guess I was just browsing the internet and came across a recipe for cheesecake brownies. http://www.browneyedbaker.com/2011/08/04/cream-cheese-cheesecakebrownies/http://www.browneyedbaker.com/2011/08/04/cream-cheese-cheesecakebrownies/
if you want to download these for a screen saver or desktop wallpaper on your computer, feel free. i will also be printing some of these out as christmas gifts this year, so if you would like a printed version, e-mail me or leave me a comment, and i will print them and send them in a display case for your desk... at a minimal fee to cover the printing and shipping cost.
What the bejesus is a winglet and why do they exist?
The Salinas-base company is recalling 2,825 cases of its Veggie Lovers Salad. The recalled salad mix has a product code of I208 and use-by date of Aug. 10.
“Man who’s young so it seems the rest of us don’t die now oddly. There’s no effect to being alive. Why create needless pain by living. At all. Or by dying, for that matter. I mean why is there creating pain by living in the first place or dying, at all? We have to. ….
She has a flannel board on one of her closet doors - the perfect tree-hanging spot!
Often my wife will call me in the morning to see how my chores are progressing. When I realize it is her calling I start the boat motor so it sounds like the lawn mower is running. I hope she doesn’t ask to many questions.
The selection of the Museum's votive and spiritual objects is magnificent and Perry's works respond to these objects effortlessly and work their way in among them, threading his own mad story of the life of his god-bear and his attempt to establish himself as a contemporary deity. He encounters everything from religious tourism to celebrity, 24 hour news and social networking and scowls at all of it. The pots are as gorgeous and as funny as they always are, mixing that lucid graphic hand with layer upon layer of collaged imagery, dense and dark at times. The final piece of the show, the boat with the casts of crafted objects and the bottles of sweat, blood and tears lashed to its mast, is a fabulous object, (in all senses of the word,) cast in Iron, lyrical and mythical, utterly convincing and deeply eccentric all at once.
1 1/4 cups boiling water
MEDIUM TERM: DOW downtrending, SPX has not confirmed
The owl is Holt's emblem because of an ancient legend. Apparently, the townsfolk were tormented by a particularly noisesome example of the species, so went to great lengths to catch it, whereupon they stuffed it up the church drain-pipe hoping to drown the poor creature. But the bird was too darn clever for them (not hard it seems thinking about it), and flew out the top. Whether he continued to torment the town afterwards or not, or hot-winged it to somewhere more remote and less-troublesome is unknown to us. The town took the nocturnal hooter as their badge, as a reminder not to be so bleeding daft!
Can a person be saved and not believe that Jesus is God? Based on the NT, I don’t believe so. It is essential in the confession of the believer that Jesus is by nature Divine. If you don’t have that, you’ve missed it.
Or, more accurately, a day of gluttony.
Source: UCB Department of Nuclear Engineering
Relation among Call, Dialog, Transaction & Message
If you're one of those generic 'creatives' it's because you didn't bother to learn how to be good at a craft and so didn't really know how shit it was.
How the hell did I get here? Did we get here? I know I am not the only one. I know that some of my friends are struggling with the same issue. Why is it that women like us, who seemingly have it all: self-respect, a great job, a good life, smarts, looks, etc. How is it we emotionally butcher ourselves by going for the worst choices of men ever? It’s not necessarily that these men are bad, they are just not right for us. Is it because we really do want to be rescued of SOMETHING (loneliness, single life, boredom?) or is it because all these choices, all these double standards, have confused us so much that we have no idea how to even trust ourselves anymore?
I posted a page all by its awkward self. I hope to post more soon to alleviate the awkward. (But making bad update predictions is what I do, so I will try to stop that. Also, neve…
The main talking point about this film is the seven minute rape scene,a lot of fuss has been paid to this area of the film,I personally found it hard to watch,its a continuous shot,there is no editing,no separate angles,just one shot that zooms slowly into the event,while watching this I felt like I had witnessed a real rape,I felt huge sympathy for the lady in question and pure hate for her attacker,and then I snapped out of this mood and realised I had just witnessed the most realistic horrific scene in any movie ever made,I did not feel joy,just a realisation that this film had just taken me somewhere other films wouldn’t even think about.
Kyon mo pe mari rang ki pichkari, Dekho kunwarji doon gi gari! (Why am I with colour sprinkled/ By me now you will be abused!”)
Shower and get ready.
*Check out Freecycle.com, Craigslist.com, and Vegsource.com These are listing services for products people want to give away or sell. Do you need a child's desk for your son's room? Try freecycle in your local area. You might get more than you imagined you could ever affort for FREE!! (I once got a dozen NICE puzzles for my grandpa with Altzheimers, and a nearly new jogging stroller...I gave away a birdcage and an old cast iron kitchen sink...a friend of mine got a flute). Need a microscope for Biology 101? Try craigslist, a local classified service and find a treasure nearby. Need MOH volume 1? Try vegsource (or even Amazon) and find a copy for just $3 plus shipping!
+13 27 26.68 , +79 10 30.74
slapped in the face to bawl awakened
Winning the PFA Player of the Year Award was widely expected; when the media report other candidates such as Wayne Rooney noting that Robin van Persie will – not might – win, it is as much of a foregone conclusion as you get. Rooney would have noted that from dressing room gossip about whom players voted for. To be honest, I cannot think of anyone who would have seriously rivalled van Persie, perhaps Joe Hart but that is it. The rest were populist nominees, players whom the back pages have raved about but their inconsistencies over the course of the season would have rendered the award irrelevant had they won.
Quality: Worth an "historic" A+ as (IMHO) possibly the best sounding recording from 1973
"Yeah! Tell me about it!"
The winter bird feeders are out and the birds are all over our back yard. We had one cold, rainy day last week that even brought bluebirds (our state bird) to our backyard. We have a wooded ravine behind our house so we don't usually get bluebirds as they prefer open spaces. The red berries on the Nandina seemed to be their reason for paying us a visit.
It’s not surprising. 95% of people who lose weight gain it all back and many of them gain back more than they lost so even if you believed that all kids can be thin and that thin is preferable, the last thing you would want to do is attempt weight control measures since the most likely outcome of that is weight gain and the second most likely outcome is developing an eating disorder. The earlier kids start intentional weight loss efforts, the more damage they do to their bodies.
“The phone obviously cuts out the body language, but is still quite effective.” He adds. “I encourage my clients to stop me if they disagree with what I am saying. Sometimes, there is a miscommunication; maybe the phone broke up or I used the wrong choice of words. This cannot be addressed if the client does not speak up. I believe there is a good sense of relationship between the client and me when using Skype or phone; however, the client must want to use Skype or phone. If the client does not like the technology, then the relationship would be very difficult to form. I do continue my in-office practice for those truckers who can make it to Lafayette Indiana and of course, my non trucking clients.”
The famous video/BET award nominated director @MRBOOMTOWN has launched his record label @imboomtownmusic aka Boomtown Music Group. Mr. Boomtown has become a huge success as a video director and wishes to continue his success with his new record label. His first artist off his label is @Mongo_Slane & @Slimmboslice which make the group @Classy_Folk Classy Folk is a group out the Dallas-Fort Worth Metroplex. Their music isn’t like other artist you hear out of Dallas. You have to hear their music for yourself! With Mr.Boomtowns talents in the directing and Classy Folks talent in making HITS, they will take Dallas to another level in the music industry. Check em out!
Without school, how do you socialize (who with, where, why...)?
It wasn’t only the looks that conveyed the intent of murder, but the body language of quite a few of her neighbors suggested they were capable of all manner of destructive behavior toward others.
The exhibit examines the use of vernacular photography including the changes technological advances such as roll film and digital photography has had on the family album. In the days of film, family photographs frequently consisted of milestone moments such as graduations, weddings, and portraits. Contemporary albums include everyday photographs, including snapshots from mobile phones. The exhibit illustrates the uses of personal photography, how and why we take photographs, as well as how photography is used to document biographical experience.
The first is theological – honor killings violate one of the most repeated and most emphasized aspects of both the Qur’an and the early histories and biographies of the Prophet (peace be upon him), that it is a sin for a Muslim to kill a fellow Muslim. Because the killing of a Muslim is such a fundamental aspect of early Islamic law – indeed, there are hadith to suggest that it was even considered a sin to kill someone who, in battle, had declared ‘there is no god but God’ for the obvious purpose of saving their own skin – claiming to kill a Muslim because you believe that person is incorrectly practicing their religion ends up being something of a Catch-22: if you are a father, who considers himself a Muslim, who is considering killing your daughter, who you consider enough of a practicing Muslim that you are concerned with her relative level of piety, you should be at least as concerned with the injunctions against killing a Muslim as you are with anything else. Indeed, that these killings sometimes become murder-suicides emphases this point – since killing a fellow Muslim and killing yourself are generally marked in the early Islamic sources as two of the gravest sins, when a person does both I’m inclined to think that either 1.) that person was not as observant as they claimed to be and was acting out of different motivation or 2.) that person was attempting to shoot the moon when it comes to sinning[3].
Your promotion is in your promoting others. Your success is discovered when you
25. A feeling that you are somehow different. A disquieting sense that everything in your life feels new and altered, that you have left your old self behind. You have. You are much greater than you can possibly imagine. There is more to come.
but also some other awesome bits and pieces as time goes on.
But i loved you, still love you like before,
Awesome Words:
In an interview soon after the opening of the controversial new Tana Beles hydroelectric dam on the Blue Nile last month, Mr Meles dismissed Egyptian complaints that the move was provocative. “Some people in Egypt have old-fashioned ideas based on the assumption that the Nile water belongs to Egypt, and that Egypt has a right to decide who gets what,” said Mr Meles.
Most awesome middle name: Jackson is not as awesome as Rawlins, but there's not much to go on here.
Between us working, studying, going to school, trying to start businesses, praising and worshipping, etc. we rarely get to spend good quality time together as a family. At the end of each normal day we enjoy a meal (dinner) together and, soon after, everyone retires to their own rooms to complete that presentation, read that last chapter, wrap-up that homework, meditate on that verse, etc. before bed – and the cycle begins the next morning. As such, trips like this are always good for bonding as we’re stuck in the car together for hours and then in the bush for days.
Here are just a few examples:
I will allow you to make a koozie on Thursday if you have all work completed and posted on your website and blog up to date.
I stand by that.
Usually I take a sudafed and drink lots of fluid plus us my saline nasal spray.
You and I know
The recent heavy UK rains are very welcome in a country which is experiencing a severe drought and hosepipe ban.
for thanking God for His dear Son,
But there are moments, although it is rare to hear in an occasional family gathering, where family members share things about them other than the good sides of their life. Sometimes family members can’t help but share the not so good happenings in their life too as they may find the occasion an opportunity to share their misery with hopes of sympathy from loved ones. No one has it all, they say. There are moments when a person can no longer contain what’s bothering him/her and one just needs someone to talk to about it. It may not necessarily be for the purpose of gaining sympathy or soliciting assistance but to at least get understanding and emotional strength to go through their troubled time most especially from their family. This is also the moment when we have to give further respect and be sensitive to their feelings. Better yet, perhaps it is best not to open up about your blessings for the mean time unless asked about it. Let it unfold and be known to others on its own. But if you hardly could keep it, at least make it a point not to sound so boastful.
One of the defendants in the case is the brother of a Free State Provincial Executive Council member.
LOOK at and meditate on the Word for wisdom, and
He is living like a King, and has absolutely no expenses whatsoever.
Foxconn
Silver necklace - Pilgrim
Near the end of the first half-hour, Goldstein expresses hope his neighbors will resist the buyout. But then comes the big offers and the Daily News headline “Bonanza.”
A thrill and a pleasure
But Daniel purposed in his heart that he would not defile himself with the king’s dainties, nor with the wine which he drank: therefore he requested of the prince of the eunuchs that he might not defile himself.
“It is ugly.”
35. “To create more positive results in your life, replace ‘if only’ with ‘next time.’”
Garlic-2pods,finely chopped
There was already and implementation from the first days of the plugin, of course, that handled this. It had an issue, in common with all GWT based frameworks. Compiling is slow and serial. So, if you have 30 modules (like I do), they will compile one after the other.
7…make videos.
This can be a difficult business and sometimes a depressing business. So for two days, I get to be more encouraging than I normally am, which is actually more my general nature. In those two days, I haven’t read your work in advance; I don’t know anything about you except what you tell me, and you know what? I can’t tell anything from that. Someone who has a poised, polished pitch might be a terrible writer, and someone who’s nervous as anything might be a genius on the page.
Bahay Nakpil is open Tuesday through Sunday from 9 am to 5 pm. The exact address is 432 A. Bautista Street, Quiapo, Manila, Philippines 1001.Phone: +63 (2) 704-8955 .
Just about everyone knows about benefit cosmetics but i have never tried any of their products so i thought i would give their Lemon aid eyelid primer a try, alot of you tuber's use this in makeup tutorials and it seems like a good product.
I am in shock! Besides TVPIX, THIS woman practically raised me from the tube every day after school.
We are in a hurry about most everything these days, aren’t we? Even in a hurry to heal. But we must be patient with ourselves and one another. We can do much to help a wound heal ‑ go to the physician ‑ have it treated ‑ put on the very best salve and bandages, but it will still take time to heal. And the deeper the wound, the longer it will take to heal…Grief is a very deep wound…
“I couldn’t run as fast as the others because I have only one leg,” the Homeless Talk vendor explained to The Citizen yesterday.
Arrange the small squares "randomly," ensuring that one of each print appears in the center four-patch. I was also careful that the directional prints pointed in all directions. What you don't want is to have 3 matching pieces lined up, and the fourth on its side. Sew four rows of four, then sew the rows together, keeping the seams aligned. I'll call this the background fabric.
- Be the person you always wanted to be. You are who you are and you need to truly accept that.
So, there I was, practicing for a solid week just because I didn’t want to be in last chair of the second violin section. I wanted to be somewhere in the middle of the second section, that was my goal.
The cheaper the place, the more likely they are to have a guy on the street, and the worse off your hair will be. Well, unless you want to look five years old again. Even a good haircut is the worst, because you have to go to work, and everyone is like, “hey, new haircut?”. So imagine a bad one.
The next morning the phone rings again. 'Are we coming? I am worried you will get lost." More soothing words from Gem.
One afternoon, we were complaining to another friend, and if memory serves me correctly, getting organically prepared for our "Chinese People". Our friend laughed her head off at the story of the Grandmother and suggested we press our hands together with our thumbs on our noses, bow, and say, "Oh, Honorable Grandmother, shut the fuck up!" It was one of the biggest laughs I ever had.
OAA Testing: The next week’s OAA testing schedule is listed below. Remember that it is very important that students are in school on scheduled testing dates. I appreciate how hard that students and parents have worked to have students to school and on time during last week’s testing. Our attendance was wonderful!
It all focussed upon imagined constituencies. My kremlinology is a bit rusty on this, but I think that the squeezed middle =Brownites, Middle England = Blairites and traditional working class = Blue Labour and so on?
As we were thinking of dessert we began to have a nice conversation with the people next to us. Claude Priolet and Karen were the kind of people you’d want to share every dinner with. Kind, polite, and well spoken, they treated Kristien to an amazingly smooth Taylor Fladgate port and me to a strong shot of Grappa di Montalcino “Banfi.” Thanks, again, to both of you!
of the CPC, a civil court cannot pass any order against the Central Government in a civil suit without first hearing the Central Government. This requirement can be waived in certain urgent cases. The present judge however has waived this requirement completely without providing a single line in reasoning as to the urgency of the matter.
The first very short video is a bit of a dud. My vanity got the better of me.
...1.5-litre turbocharged engine's flexibility helps too, which gives you quite the same basic four-cylinder turbocharged engine found in the mitsubishi evolution mr edition and will sell better as a desirable, well-rounded package. The manufacturers have employed numerous small tweaks to achieve superior fuel economy on their environmentally-friendly models. The ClearTec Colt has some of the common-rail injection engine sourced from Peugeot that produces 154bhp. Torque is measured at 380Nm and the mitsubishi evolution rs, the white mitsubishi evolution and eager to pile on the mitsubishi evolution mr edition that runs between the mitsubishi evolution mr edition. It's a huge improvement over the mitsubishi evolution vi is surprisingly tight for what is one of these superminis that take a kind of short trip, urban motoring that a well-specified double or crew - cab could effectively replace a company that's following a roadmap back to profitability. The total sales for vehicles of this iconic all-wheel drive double cabs are restricted to 1,500mm due to their additional passenger space. Although the mitsubishi evolution 4, the mitsubishi evolution mr edition it happen. From the mitsubishi evolution mr edition and traction control system, more than capable of sixty from rest in just 7.4s which is extremely sprightly for a sports tuned chassis that includes thicker anti-roll bars, firmer springs and more economical. As a result, theyre an increasingly popular choice for supermini buyers especially those who value muscular performance and harbour a phobia for filling station forecourts. This brings us to the mitsubishi evolution vs for the mitsubishi evolution mr edition but it never feels that fast, and the 2003 mitsubishi evolution with its dowdy predecessor.
A-Ha The sun always shines on TV N
-Place the chicken in a tray with breast side down,legs up and cover the chicken with foil and cook for 30-45 minutes covered flipping the sides halfway.(I have broiled the chicken the last 3 minutes,that is strictly optional-so,you can see the leg bones browned in pic)
According to the rules of accepting the award, I have to:
Krewe of Barkus: the only krewe by and for canines of all types.
Ok in all seriousness, it can be difficult to be a straight up "fairytale" princess like that but it is possible to act like like a beautiful, kind and successful 'princess'.
I like the idea of a strong female character who can conquer the hero or the bad guy and still be kind of normal. Hence, the secretary with the power.
I picked up some thin cork sheets from Michael's and cut them into strips. I glued the strips onto the edges of the tile using E-6000 glue (that stuff is amazing!). You could probably just use little squares of cork in the corners of the tile, but I wanted be certain that they wouldn't scratch up my momma's tables!
I couldn't get over my disdain for this website. While am I letting this WEBSITE make me feel bad? Like I'll never measure up to its expectations?
My ex-girlfriend’s birthday is coming up, May 9th, and I am struggling to figure out if I should contact her (only by text). Here is the situation, I haven’t spoken about her on this blog.
It looks the part--beautiful spun gold, frothy bead, dense, white head. Softly sweet of palate, with a faintly biscuity maltiness; a slight bubblegum note (phenols), and alcohol warmth drying out in the finish. One criticism: the body is too light; it goes watery just when it should be supporting the heft of the style.
Our goal in doing this, is to honor the Lord first and foremost. But also in illuminating to our children the "lost" meaning of this commandment.
PARANOID?
9. Haruki Murakami "1Q84"
So I have been a slacker with blogging lately because of the holidays. I didn't have to take too many dishes to places and I ate meals that other people cooked.... then ate the leftovers =) So there hasn't been much cooking going on lately besides a couple recipes I don't feel are worth sharing.
You can give captions to all the photos or just pick any one you like.
Truman (The Space Between by Brenna Yovanoff) Everything seems to go wrong for this poor kid.
It was funny to watch the reactions of the older tourists, especially to Chloe. As she would toddle close to the pool, they would begin twitching with the need to go save her, looking at Frank and me with open mouths and raised eyebrows as we kicked back in the hot tub, smiling calmly. Then Chloe would fling herself off the edge in a high-flying cannonball, paddle to the steps, and do it all over again.
A time when we could dream of interstellar empires.
Making spells
14. Pretzel Logic.
I guess Japanese is super changing very fastly .... good way? or bad way? I dont know! because I've never met 'samurai' LOL
the eyes are still brown, yet with no trace of laughter, of fire, of mischief.
A community event, everyone welcome.
I was told once that I should "dress for the job I want, not the job I have". Alright, I get that. But it still doesn't explain why the job that I want requires me to dress up any more than I do in my current job. Couldn't the job I want just as easily be a job where I can wear jeans and a t-shirt, instead of dress pants and a button down?
Becky has put together Kits to make everyday tasks a little more fun: The Busy Mama Homekeeping Kit (18 documents), is a complete kit to keep your homekeeping manageable and on-track. The Busy Mama Kit is designed in fun fonts and colors and is meant to be used month after month, year after year. It has documents that every homekeeping binder needs - a variety of lists, perpetual calendars, a deep cleaning checklist, a medical information sheet, daily and weekly planner pages...
Today he really and mysteriously injured himself. He has a huge gouge in his right front arm pit. The vet was able to stick her whole hand up in it. She had to suture muscle and skin. His whole shoulder shakes. He's not putting any weight on it. He rears back, loads his hind end, and hops forward on his good front leg. He's locked in his stall, and I'm going out in the morning to see if he's putting weight on it. If not we'll do x-rays to see if there's a fracture. The problem is that the high today was 17 degrees and the x-ray machine's readout screen doesn't work in these temps. If there is a fracture it would be his Humerus, which is a major weight bearing bone in his leg/shoulder. There wouldn't be anything we could do.
We transferred the contents of the fermenters to our cold storage tanks, to carbonate and further clear and age the biere.
P Schoolbook cart- Circles 1/2"
Despite being quite a fan of the Warhammer universe, for the longest time I resisted reading the novels released by Games Workshop's publication house Black Library. This was pretty much for the same reason I avoided Dungeons & Dragons novels and indeed most modern fantasy fiction, gaming-related or otherwise... I read a few of these books a long time ago and they are awful.
Maytime (US…Norman Z.Leonard)
and we'll have a pudding in half an hour
We've added a few new things to the store...we hope you can pop by and have a little look. Please remember that there is no minimum order or P&P in the UK so the price you see is the price you pay!!
Tröckener Kecks Met hart en ziel NL
Operation Get Good Hair is far from over…
Rarely in finance do deals take effect on an arbitrary date. There’s often a time lag when money is ‘properly’ spent under the governing accounting laws of the period [in the United States, the power of the purse vests with Congress (or so They say)]. M1 money supply is a figure you may be interested in. When a currency is perpetuated in debt, it leads to immoral practices and malinvestment. The malinvestment is never allowed to liquidate, creating/perpetuating moral hazard(s). It isn’t allowed to happen because of ‘interests’ in the deal that frankly shouldn’t be there.
It sounds simple – and it is! The hard part is lifting off that easy chair and getting started.
I settle when I choose residency in this world and not the Kingdom of God. I will benefit from my citizenship and according to the laws that govern my home. The Kingdom of Heaven is mine when I choose to reside in the Presence of God and make His Spirit at home in me. My life should reflect that of a foreigner or temporary resident as one who respects the rules and inhabitants but has an allegiance to Heaven. (I Peter 2:11-12) I must choose to live according to the holiness and righteousness of God’s Kingdom rather than man’s idea of a good life. I must live a “God” life to obtain all His Kingdom benefits settling for nothing less to obtain the Prize! (Hebrews 11:13-16)
Testing
“Now the President is outraged because the GOP House leadership called his bluff and ended discussions with him because they deemed him an obstruction to any real solution to the debt crisis. He has been deemed a lame duck president. And he is angry now because he is being treated as such.
Tell me what I am missing, because I just don't see much difference between Bush and Romney other than Romney is far more left than the centrist Bush.
overtones of the fourth dimension.
Like my fellow bird lovers, I go to Nando’s for the best grilled chicken on the planet, but to truly whip up an appetite and to get the taste of what’s to come, you have to order the Peri Bites. These mouth-watering chillies are deep-fried with a crisp coat, and have a cheesy centre with a little chunk of their famous peri-basted chicken. For those unlucky few who live in a country where Nando’s doesn’t serve these treats, here’s a pocket-friendly way to try these out within the confines of your own homes.
All in all this app is a good start to introduce a preschooler to phonics or to reinforce the learning of phonics through the Reception year at school and into Key Stage One, where sounds are still consolidated.
Life Path 3 Compatibility
Bristol Brewing Company Edge City IPA
Yesterday, I put Talyn under warp for the first time. It took me a solid eleven hours to get it done, and we’re talking about a warp I had made a few months ago for something else that didn’t pan out. Scary, isn’t it? I just can’t seem to get the hang of warping. It just eludes me over and over again. What did I do? I managed to tangle it again. I don’t get it either.
What he had on his mind, however, still makes me stop and think from time to time. What was trying to say? What did ne want everyone to understand that was so inmportant, it just could nowait? He said just two words, but he said them over and over, to everyone, until he felt, I guess, that he got his point across. At the top of his lungs, to a small crowd of disappointed and bewildered family, he said, "Horse C~~k!". That's right, "horse", then the word archaically used to refer to a male chicken. He turned around so that everyone could hear him repeat it five or six times, "Horse C~~k! Horse C~~k! Horse C~~k!". He took time to slow it down and say it right into one old lady's face, "Hooorrrssse C~~~~k," which caused him to laugh hysterically. That, in turn, caused me and the rest of the youngsters to start laughing. But he wasn't done. Oh no. As the families started to gather up their people and belongings, Bill go up on the picnic table, despite the admonitions of his closest family members, who had gone from horror to damage control at this point. That's when he started the rapid fire from on top of the picnic table, "Horse c~~k, horse c~~k, horse c~~k", followed by a final, punctuational "HORSE C~~K!". There, he was through. As the yard thinned out and only a few disappointed aunts and uncles hung and shook their heads, he apparently had gotten his point across. To this day I am not sure what that point was, but whatever it was, he got it all out on that sunny 4th of July so many years ago.
The same is true with sex with others, be it same sex or heterosexual. Sex is to be free of wanting if we are to touch the divine. When wanting is absent, one has the experience of true presence, and this alone, with or without touch, can be soulfully orgasmic. It is a question of openness, readiness and willingness to be seen wholly, as we are without façade, fears and ego. A simple, connected gaze can lead our entire being into a different, expanded realm, one more real than what our limited perceptions and habitual personality would want us to see and believe. Sacred sexuality is not about or limited to genitalia. Sacred sex is about the force of life that flowers through the soul, meeting spirit through the body. It electrifies this moment into the fullness of being. It is living our fullest potential, realizing our magnificence and being divine incarnate. Sacred sexuality is not about the act of sex, but about reverential acknowledgement and humble awe at the spiritual force that flows through life, that we only know when we are willing to become quietly, lovingly spacious, unbound and free of all sense of disconnection.
Sorry for the radio silence these past few days. My son has a bad cold-masquerading as strep-negative for strep-sore throat-headache-fever-chills-could it be the flu-or pneumonia-hope-it-gets-better-soon thing going on. He has missed the past three days of school. I will be calling the doctor again today.
I should say that today, I don't feel like I failed anything. Not really. I used to, before sobriety, but not now. I still feel like I failed some friends, my first marriage, but I also could only be who I was at the time. You don't know what you don't know. I tried to be better, but I wasn't. I never have to be that person again. It sounds hokey, but it is a total sea change.
Kitty Hugs, Judy
What is your favorite vacation spot? Affordable or not…
Had the leadership team conducted a comprehensive operational audit of the college, they would have known where additional cuts could be safely made. They would have known which programs were vital and which were expendable. They would have been able to engage relevant constituencies in factual discussions to develop fact-based outcomes.
Also, please check out the Ultimate Alphabet Craft Collection on my blog. It is a collective of many, many great ideas for teaching children letter recognition and sounds.
last two and a half years called into the SITUATION ROOM.
Maurice G
Not everything about the rSogn is "classic randonneur." The dramatically sloping top tube, mostly welded frame, and threadless steerer mark it as a modern bike. But for anyone interested in trying out the low trail/ 650B handling characteristics, this is a comparatively affordable way to go. And it's not just about affordability: rSogn owners seem very pleased with this model - describing it as fast, responsive, and comfortable over long distances. It is reputed to be a fast brevet/ road-to-trail bike that fits cushy tires and is optimised to carry a front load.
The shards crackle and pop under the weight of His feet.
Descriptions of encounters, in particular, this conversation could be potentially inappropriate if I were younger and vulnerable. But I feel tough and impenetrable, and everything the world offers is material. In the middle of the narrative, I was thinking, this is oral history of a convoluted, funny-petty, kind. Fazli could have interviewed him for his book. Karachi was a Playboy Paradise. A mini Europe. Drugs, Sex, Strip Clubs, coupled with Third World tin pot. Everything that is now done at homes and gone underground, and infested with TB and inflation, was out in the open, only waiting for Zia to take a plunger to its innocent, debaucherous heart. The stuff my father never shared with me but I found out anyway, snooping through drawers, at 8, in the quest for material. They went to nude beaches in Germany in the 60s and cruelly told us, the General's bastards (only) adding to our lustful wish list -- fight tyranny, free women, go to nude beach....
We first roasted whole chicken in England. We were in love with how cheap things were at the Granger Market in Newcastle, and at 2 quid per whole chicken versus, like, 12 quid per package of chicken breast, we had to adapt. We found a great recipe for lemon rosemary chicken and went for it. And it was amazing. We were hooked. Looking back, I realize that this was us playing at being domestic and responsible. Most nights we’d meet friends for drinks ’round the pub and swing by some kebab shop at 3:00 a.m. for garlic chips, but we’d almost always make a meal together before we left. We lived in England and we were having a blast. Bills and jobs would have to wait. Roasting a chicken made us feel good about that.
A word of advice from your good buddy Karla May:
It's not even about the dropped calls.
I recommend Because of Me by Fay Lamb.
So the question, for me, is how we went from politics being an institution creating the necessary social conditions for man living in it, to being about the politicians themselves?
Listen. Reflect. Enjoy.
He rides nature’s current
All I did was move the one closet bar up to allow for another to be put up under it….put a shelf over the lower bar and tada! way more closet space!
So last Thursday came and went, and I forgot to blog about our experience celebrating Rosh Hashanah. Rosh Hashanah is a Jewish holiday which means "head of the year" literally. Is it the beginning of the Jewish new year (the new year is 5771). It is the birthday of mankind and celebration of Adam and Eve's creation as well. The main focus is on God being our King.
Take a few minutes to sit quietly. Reach out to the Elements for additional energy and power. Fill the space around you with their power and energy and reflect on the new moon as an opportunity for new beginnings. An opportunity that we are offered over and over again.
Truth: Bob Dylan had a certain knack for conveying deep truths. Jackson Browne’s “Lives in the Balance” is another truthful song. A portrait can reveal a person’s idiosyncratic facial expression or the cracks and lines of age. A book can allegorically deal with a subject matter that rings true (conspiracy theories can have this property too). An application on the web can be pure and clean (such as the Google search page, for example). Truth can be found in all sorts of art.
So, natural sinus infection cure is a better option than taking medicines. You do not have to worry about the side effects.
Speaking of runners, did anyone see the House and Home TV table runner made from brown kraft paper? If you didn't, be sure to watch because I bet you'd also love he modern country kitchen featured before the table runner DIY. It's a stunner.
5 science
Back from five days of travel, and I missed my Tuesday weigh-in, so need to wait until next week. On the down side, I was not as abstemious during my travels as I had hoped. There was wine, there was chocolate, and there were goals not met. On the up side, it appears from my home scale that I (miraculously) didn’t gain weight, and also, I am happy that my behavior was NOT what it would have been pre-Optifast, when travel was a green light to pig out, beginning with that first airplane cocktail (which I didn’t have, coming or going, this time).
They died. They did not need a meteor crashing to the ground or some single event to make them extinct. They were unable to survive as flightless birds probably due to their environment being disrupted by the addition of animals and people who may have hunted them or destroyed their nests which previously had been safe on the ground.
Every show on every channel seems to be centered around a middle-class joint family which somehow lives in a mansion and seems to be stuck in the 70s. What is the USP of a channel nowadays? Star One may not have had great programming (they had a show based on Twilight, for crying out loud) but at least they knew who their target audience was. The channel which replaced it “Life Ok” seems like another addition to an already crowded GEC space.
Also, there are much better ways to remove the problem of failure being boring or out of genre. For example, look at Leverage, where character stats are insanely high, so failure almost never happens, and when it does only causes complications, not failure (and complications can happen even if you succeed, so you get to feel awesome AND have interesting failures). Or look at Smallville, where nobody can actually fail at anything, randomly. Success and failure operate outside the dice roll, but the dice roll is still important and emulative. Smallville doesn’t quite work for mysteries (unless both the detective and the criminal are PCs) but it’s another interesting approach to success (or really failure – it happens a lot in Smallville, but not because of the dice, but because success would destroy the angst – in many ways, soap operas are the opposite of mysteries, because they thrive on nobody finding out anything). Both games also have no sense of damage, with failure ALWAYS meaning complications, which removes much of the issue of downbeats anyway – you can’t stop the story if failure is never dull. It’s not unlike Paranoia and Warhammer where you look forward to failing because it was more hilarious that way.
we're shooting for the 26??
It's pretty clear why the officers are here, too. I asked one in front of the Command Center about it the other day, and our conversation went sometime like this:
Seeking control.
1 3/4 cup of plain flour (sieve)
What I also mean to say is that what I get in return is often much more than just a financial reward..
Late last night, a former Wapping staffer told The Slog, “It’s brilliant. Newscorp is the only company in the world that would cover up a whitewash”.
They did have quite a few goodies, but unfortunately, since we were just coming from the farmers market, our pockets were near empty... just a few dollars were available for spending. But sometimes that's all you need.
10The same shall drink of the wine of the wrath of God, which is poured out without mixture into the cup of his indignation; and he shall be tormented with fire and brimstone in the presence of the holy angels, and in the presence of the Lamb:
Evan woke up happy and seemed fine. He didn't have as much of an appetite as he normally does, but other than that, he seemed fine. So, Greg went on to work. Both boys played great that day and acted fine, but as the day progressed I started to get a sore throat and feel achy. When Greg came home, he took both boys out so I could take a nap. The next day I was worse, body aches, tired, chills, etc. So, Greg took off work and kept the boys for me while I rested most of the day.
Speaking of missing.
"Gawd," I said disparagingly. "I am so over bar-hopping downtown."
“That’s all you need to know.”
when the wind comes to dance.
I had to make one of these for Emma, because her birthday is coming up and I refuse to pay $30 for a birthday shirt. I won't tell you how much I paid for everything, but I will be making a considerable amount more than one shirt, so it's okay!
Dyan
Bring to a boil, then bring the heat back down to a low simmer and cover with a lid.
Now that you've purchased a flimsy car bed and picked out a nice spot on the lawn where the baby can sunbathe all day (and if that sounds crazy, you'll need to read Parts 1 and 2 to learn what you've been doing wrong so far), you're no doubt ready to find out what to do if your child gets sick. AND HE WILL. So strap in for...
Movements are really messy and what you see on the internet, television, and public statements is only one thin layer of what's really going on. What is the #occupy movement and how will it matter in the short and long terms?
So, und jetzt wollt Ihr endlich zumindest einen der neuen Stempel sehen, richtig? Bitte sehr:
BNP News Team
The Lord slamed his fists together. "I told you I would be alone and you believed me, you fool. You know you need to help the resistence."
I listened to the audio and I enjoyed the narrator. As in the first book, this one ends with a clue as to the next of Gideon's adventures. I look forward to seeing what trouble he can get into next!
Kids and parents: Show your support for the new Prospect Park West bike path by riding it as a family this Sunday, April 10!
sl st = slip stitch
Ten years ago my wife and I made a 40 mile trip to Arcadia, Florida to get her Christmas present, a cute, bubbly and totally crazy pug.
Meeting Dom was the most incredible thing that had ever happened to me. When Eve falls for the secretive, charming Dom in Switzerland, their whirlwind relationship leads them to Les GenEvriers, an abandoned house set among the fragrant lavender fields of the South of France. Each enchanting day delivers happy discoveries: hidden chambers, secret vaults, a beautiful wrought-iron lantern. Deeply in love and surrounded by music, books, and the heady summer scents of the French countryside, Eve has never felt more alive.
Does anything good ever follow the words, "Now don't freak out?"
to pick up my friend Jocelyn to go for a bit-o-thrifting!!
Ahhh....the 90's....So filled with angst and rebellion and flannel. Loads of flannel. I think it's a period of time so misunderstood. Given the label "generation X" and criticized for our rebellion against anything commercial, our negative attitudes and our general lack of hygiene. But upon reflection? We also changed the political climate in this country and made the voice of young people more powerful than they had been in decades. We enlightened the baby boomers to the challenges of keeping up with the picket white fence facade. We majored in philosophy and women's studies and made it cool to THINK again instead of running with the herd. (Okay, and when it was all over we all went to law school or med school but we still made a point.) But more than anything, the music of the 90's changed the music scene permanently. Gone were the days of flashy pop and bubblegum....poetry and rebellion were reborn. It was a time for music to mean something again. Dubbed "alternative music" by commercial institutions, it was really a time for young folks to explore and grow, get mad and talk about it. I loved the 90's (I wish it had not included matte make-up and a short attempt at being a red head) but I loved it.
1. Start it on the side
the pillow in.
Except this year, his favorite hoe is missing. The one with the splintered handle, the dull/dented blade, and the coat of rust that only time could bestow.
You’re better than the best
Needless to say, the roommate was friendly enough, but I didn’t get that close to her. I was barely ever in the room anyway because I spent all my time at Clint’s. I think I slept in my loft overnight twice. And one of those times was because Clint’s family was staying with us, so Clint & I escaped to my room so they can sleep in the bed. And by that time, the roommate had moved out, so it was an empty dorm room for the second half of the year.
‘Such energy demands mean there is a limit to the information we can process.’
Hmmm… guess we should’ve paid more attention to the warning coming from the big black cloud. But noooooo!!!!! We were determined to use our new toy.
Remain faithful to your masters and mistresses, your overseers and bombas, and… perform all your work with as much love and diligence as if you were working for yourselves. You must know that Christ himself puts each one of his children to work; for the Lord has made everything Himself – kings, masters, servants, and slaves. And as long as we live in this world, everyone must gladly endure the state into which God has placed him and be content with God’s wise counsel.
PS just a quick post script, I have updated my Gingerbread House page, all the houses I have posted are on there for you to see.
so many things to learn about…
I’m still a bit lost for words at this. I can’t quite get my head around the necessary sequence of events. First, this person must have experienced a feeling of crushing disappointment at realising that a character she’d read about had dark skin (even though, I’m told, this character’s skin colour is explicitly described as such in the book). Further, it must have entirely failed to occur to them that the qualities she originally admired or appreciated in Rue might still be present – that the colour of her skin might be no hindrance whatever to this young girl being innocent, or likeable, or courageous, or charming, or quick-witted, or whatever she’s like.
I ain’t talkin’ credit report baaybee. Nope, I’m talking furniture. Lots of furniture and nothing gets my heart racing more than getting my hands on a tired old piece that can come to life with the simple stroke of a brush. Just like Miss Mustard Seed. Now that is one talented lady and while I cannot hold a candle to her, I can sure have fun tryin!
If you are like me, you live in between two worlds. On the one hand, there are the old beliefs and customs that we learn from our parents, on the other hand, there are all these modern values that might oppose what they have taught us. Apart from that, some of us have also decided to leave the country of our births. It can get confusing sometimes. There are the things that we learn in childhood, there are some things we pick up as we grow up, and there are some things that we pick up from the friends we choose. I think, I have been lucky because the friends I’ve had growing up have been from very diverse backgrounds, and have all had very diverse personalities.
Part love story, part mystery, part visual collage, this novel is told through images as much as it's told through words. Ultimately the reader must decipher what is real, what is imagined, and what has been madness all along.
the “Family Style” House Salad is for a minimum of two guests (at a cost of $6.00 per person), and with some nice olives, marinated mushrooms and the like hiding in with the lettuce and red wine vinaigrette, it was quite good, and a good value (especially for Disney).
May stay our loves surrender for a time.
Once again looking at this blog you will find a favorite phrase of mine, and once again it has to do with my fantasy series. My wife helped me think of this phrase when I read a passage to her that took her breath away. She said she felt like she just went on a roller coaster ride, and I thought of a ride called the Lightning. I also thought of a Stephen King short story, "Riding the Bullet." The phrase "riding the lightning" just jumped out at me and I've loved it ever since.
The only issue here (which may not actually be such a bad thing) is that once I realized how cheap (or free) you could find things, it's become a challenge to see how little I have to pay for something. And it makes it easier to splurge when I find something I REALLY have to have, but isn't cheap. I consider that balance.
In the meantime, it wouldn’t hurt to enforce traffic rules more tightly. One small complication with this particular intersection is that it sits right on the boundary of Pasay and Paranaque. Edison Avenue is literally the dividing line on the map. There have been patrols before, but then the politics of jurisdiction (“That’s not my problem!”) got in the way. I hope they all grow up a bit. (Pasay police would man their side but not mind Paranaque’s at all. When things got testy, one side would just point fingers at the other. It’s really pathetic.)
A few interesting points that came up in the following Q & A: Someone suggested that the sales of shortlisted books are not always good, but M J Hyland said that sales of her shortlisted book far outstrip that of her others, and keep doing so. In response to the idea that the best books stand the test of time and rise to the top anyway, she said that getting a prize is a great thing for an author, though, because authors need to eat and can very rarely make a living out of writing. On the idea that many winners don't stand the test of time, Vona Groarke made the point that we can hardly expect them to: in fact, we would be very lucky to get a truly remarkable book each decade, leave alone each year. Someone, Ian McGuire I think, commented that to invest in just two or three writers a year (which results from the prize culture) does not make for a healthy literature culture. Writers need to be given a chance to develop their careers, to produce non-prizewinning books at the start, and I think the implication was that a literary conversation dominated by prizes pushes publishers away from that. On the other hand (my notes tell me someone said), prizes could contribute to such a different kind of culture, but I don't recall anyone saying how. De Groot suggested that literary festivals bespeak a public desire to have the kind of conversation about books that was generally felt to be squeezed. Finally Festival Director Cathy Bolton asked what the panel felt about the online platform to which Ian McGuire saw that the literary discussion had moved. M J Hyland said she found it scary - she could be devastated by a bad Amazon review - but such democratisation and widening of the discussion had to be a good thing. Ian McGuire said that some of it was excellent, more objective than newspaper criticism which often consisted of writers reviewing each others' books, and one had to view it as part of the changing world of books.
But I am learning
Friday:After the draining week, I enjoyed taking a scheduled furlough day that Friday, running errands and going to appointments. There was no need for me to wear stage blacks, but I continued the theme anyhow. It is fortunate that my snow boots are also black, because I needed them that morning.
We decided to take a walk along the river by the golf course because they had just put in a walk way, so we were walking and enjoying the nice night when Joe stopped talking and i turn around and there he is down on one knee, and told me to come over... He then proceeded to ask for my hand in marriage, i was so surprised that i said "are you serious" (how romantic huh?:)) Of course i said yes and as we were walking back of course everyone knew by then and they were waiting and excited for us! I have the best class and group of friends!!
I was the lucky recipient of a surprise blog candy anniversary over at Yvonne's Journey into Artistry and as if the candy was not sweet enough, look at this beautiful card she sent along. If you have not been to Yvonne's blog, take the time to stop by for a visit. Thank you so much, Yvonne!
Sometimes a photo of one of our children in their new pajamas stops me in my tracks…they are all beautiful and vulnerable and I want to scoop them all up in my arms and hug them until they wiggle free. But today was a bit different. I felt a shiver slowly move up my spine when the photo below opened on my screen.
I did make a change in the sweetener used. Brooke used a combination of splenda and sugar, but I prefer honey for an alternative sweetener. Because I used honey, I had to reduce other liquid (veg oil) and lower the oven temperature.
Morning will be run/jog/walk (in my Vibram Five Fingers no doubt) and Yoga/Meditation! Then Turbo Fire in the evening. Now, if this proves to be too much I will drop the run/jog/run and just do my Yoga.
It can also be really fun to account for texture and fragrance. But I'll leave that to others with more experience.
The doilies, ribbon and dark pink papers are from my own stash.
but she paid him a kind glance before once more diving beneath the silent waters of the lake, leaving the disconsolate boy alone with his straying cattle. But the memory of that glance gave him hope, and when he told his mother of what had passed, and she advised him that perhaps it was lightly-baked bread that the lady preferred.
"Yes," the caller replied. "Um, two, two, two gunshots to one man. … It looks like one to the chest and another …"
And the tag line?
Our pumpkin patch is beautiful with its different shapes, colours, and sizes. From Rouge Vif d'Etampes "cinderella" pumpkins, to giants, to carving and to small pie pumpkins. All but the giant pumpkins are edible, and we'll be preserving as much as possible. Seeds for next year, snacks, and the meat for pies, soups, and other undiscovered uses.
The description on the product info card is as follows:
His entry into the world was fast and furious but oh, so welcomed.
I am so sorry I have been away for so long. Things have been busy. I was sitting my finals at university in February and March and I guess it took it's toll on everything. I knew I had to make passing my finals my main priority and I felt that the stress of restricting would be too much to combine with that. I tried to eat healthy but old restricting ways would creep back in every so often. I'm happy to say though that I have maintained the same weight since January and easing off the diet and exercise hasn't caused to many problems!!!
“We re-purposed and repackaged for radioactive decontamination of water and beverages a tried-and-true process that originally was developed to mine the oceans for uranium and remove uranium and heavy metals from heavily contaminated water,” said Allen Apblett, Ph.D., who led the research team. “The accident at the Fukushima nuclear plant in Japan and ongoing concerns about possible terrorist use of nuclear materials that may contaminate food and water led us to shift the focus of this technology.”
I’d chat up some little cutie from the dining hall, and before too long, I’d be hanging around in her dorm room. Her pleasant-but-dumpy room mate would be there as well. While my amorous intentions were held in check by the presence of Mandy or Becky or whatever the hell her roomie’s name was, I would look around the dorm room, sizing the place up, hoping to spot some clues which might come in handy later if whatsername ever left.
I was one of them. I met Michael in the men's room at the University of Pennsylvania's Museum of Archeology and Anthropology, during one of his mass tastings that was part of The Book & The Cook. It was before I even knew what TB&TC was; Michael Jackson was in town doing a beer tasting, what else did I need to know? After the tasting (yes, I took notes, and still have them), Jackson was signing books and I overheard someone asking him a question about "stock ale," in the context of the Samuel Adams Boston Ale, then sub-labeled as a stock ale. MJ gave a somewhat circuitous answer that left me still curious (At a TB&TC press breakfast years later, I told him I admired how he took questions, any question, from a beer audience and answered in detail. "It's simple," he told me. "If I don't know the answer, I take a sentence or two to speculate, another sentence to note what other subject that brings up, and then I just answer the question I want to answer.").
Despite our eagerness to remain hidden from you, we have recently caught up on one of your more bizarre film sub-genres and find ourselves unusually eager to set the record straight. Although these cheesy horror films about female monsters have spawned new and riotous drinking games, we would like to hope that our news might spur new advances in thinking among your kind.
No matter if he is busy with his own Mask Orchestra or co-operates with various European radio big bands – Colin Towns stands out from the run-of-the-mill arranging trade.
Each of us born in the same light–
Ryan- MR. Dry Wit. His delivery of one liners is impeccable and was a huge help in introducing me to the rest of the guests
Addicted to releasing thoughts in an unexplainable way, An art form truly so sacred higher than numbers, Thus I release pictures any ordinary day, Transformed into thoughtful images that paint righteous colors, So I believe he gifted those with metaphoric terminology, To spread wise thoughts & decrypt life's calligraphy, To let those individuals know that an art form exists from within, Maybe even to keep those from committing a sin/
The pie was left over, and the meat didn't come from the farmers' market, but honestly those were the least enjoyable parts of the meal (incredibly delicious though they were). It was the farm-fresh tasty that rocked my world - the sweet, juicy corn that didn't even need butter, the asparagus all crisp and delicious, and best of all, the salad, with the sharp bitter arugula as a perfect complement to those sweet, succulent strawberries.
The right-of-way skirted the hills at the edge of the Putnam Ranch. Near the Jack Creek crossing Horace Putnam and George Hedrick deeded the site for a siding and station to be called Putnam. They hardly expected a town to grow up around it, as occurred after Charles Drain donated the site for another station and siding years earlier. But it was a nice
(Warning: the Siren is going to discuss the entire movie, including the end. Spoilers abound.)
….and I swear I am not making this up…
j-drama Densha Otoko - which was pissing me off most of the watching time ! Really... But still I couldn't let it be and completed it in a few days...
So as you can see, he gave me a lot of ideas to work with.
“You’re actually wearing it,” Emma badgered Allen, as they pulled out of the garage.
I’d always call your Mum once I’d landed at Dallas. My flight to Lawton, Oklahoma would usually take off around 4:30pm and it was always from the same terminal and the same gate. I forget which one now… but there’s a Subway near Gate 34 on the same concourse LOL On one occasion I missed the flight (probably the same time my flight out of England was delayed) and I had to wait for the next flight, two hours later. The flight to Lawton was probably about thirty minutes in the air, if that.
or Iraq.
I attended the Willow Garden Tour yesterday, and it was fabulous! The weather cooperated ALL DAY! I couldn't believe it! It was very obvious that many people put a lot of effort into this event, and it was well worth it. And this was the 25th anniversary of this tour, which made it a little special!
--decide if I want a crib skirt (could be nice to use under crib as storage?)
So that’s my theory, and it’s just that, a theory. Yet to be proven or disproven – I’m open to any alternative theories talk to me on twitter @TheRealSabian
The rigid religious types, of all religions, in all countries, will be
“NBC’s Andrea Mitchell on Sunday conceded ‘Paul Ryan has shown considerable guts’ with his Medicare plan, but she declared liberal Democratic Congressman Chris Van Hollen is ‘correct that nobody on the Republican side is showing any courage on the tax front. And unless taxes are part of the mix,’ NBC…”
Looking at this!
So it took me a few days to get 2011's first post up, but I think you'll find it worth the wait. If the cover art for this one doesn't tell you everything you need to know, then I just can't help you (but I'll try anyway). This 12" was made in the US of A and delivers top notch minimal synth wave that the whole family can enjoy (How's that?). Clean, crisp synthesizers cruise from track to track on drum machine perfection. The harmonic, quasi-surf vocals only add to the fun. For fans of the darker tinged tunes, like me, "The Look In Your Eyes" steers in that direction a bit. Really great record, guys & gals. A true gem from beginning to end. Enjoy!
I would like to present you new car from Pagani - Pagani Huyara.
The cleaning lady, who was standing nearby said, "So cute! When she wants more milk she says, "encore!" I turned in astonishment -- I'd already started a frantic online search for purchasable uncles -- and said, "Coco, are you saying 'encore'?" She nearly split herself in two with the grinning and the laughing and the rolling joyfully on the floor. She had been understood! Finally! By the cleaning lady!
I have a sick note so does that count! Anyway bugs are on the way out and my crafting mojo is alive and kicking :) So you have come here via your reading list or most likely from Julia's blog 'Stamping ground' and you want a nosey at my desk so here it is
2 cloves diced garlic
- Demonstrate financial need;
Of their tender human youth!
And I tried so very hard
"It kills you to see them grow up. But I guess it would kill you faster if they didn't." Barbara Kingsolver
And terrorist entered the building and gave us all haircuts.
Prejudice of prejudices! Firstly, it would be possible that the true constitution of things was so hostile to the presuppositions of life, so opposed to them, that we needed appearance in order to be able to live--After all, this is the case in so many situations; e.g., in marriage.
1. The secret to success is never try to control a controller
1. Astronomy.com - Astronomy, the world's bestselling astronomy magazine, also has a website with educational resources for astronomers of all ages. Only magazine subscribers can gain access to the site's premium features, but there are a number of free resources that are available to everyone.
This SOPA (Stop Online Piracy Act) is, at best, horrific. It’s an attempt to prevent US servers from accessing certain foreign websites. The scary part is that this is the beginning of US censorship of the internet.
I would LOVE to have marble counter tops in our future house. In the apartment we just moved into the bathroom has fake marble counters. I actually kinda like them :)
I was nineteen and passionately, newly married. I couldn't imagine anyone old being romantic. That is, until that moment, listening to my mother-in-law's words.
For all of you locals, please know that I’m at my studio almost every day and MORE than happy for you to visit me. Whether you need a gift, or want to say hello, please don’t hesitate to drop in. I don’t want to miss you, so make sure you call me at 864.607.4381 or email me to set up an appointment. For everyone online, you can browse and shop from my catalog at www.lilypottery.com/catalog feel free email me with questions and orders.
A new non-retro item I did add to this bike, was a wireless bike computer. It was actually a gift from my old man, who is also huge bicycle enthusiast. This little unit does it all! It's got a clock, an odometer, speedometer, counts calories and fat burned, tracks your workouts, top speed, and even displays the temperature. I can already tell it will prove to be invaluable for my afternoon and weekend rides.
Any Road
“Hey Sista! Hey Dude!”he greeted as he gave me a friendly smile and patted the gut on the back.
I looked over at him, and I just wanted to say something to him to describe the warm and fuzzy feelings I had inside. In my head, I thought, “I feel really strongly about you.” But um, that isn’t very romantic. Somehow, this is what came out of my mouth:
John F. Kennedy and George Washington were our two richest presidents by far.
But documents in the cache show that leaders of the Nigerian group had been in contact with top levels of al-Qaeda in the past 18 months – confirming claims made to the Guardian in January by a senior Boko Haram figure.
Fabricated. All of it. Never said it.
It all started on a Tuesday, driving to College Station.
The Bud brand has produced a few winners under the Bud Light name in the last few years. Bud Light Lime is a pretty refreshing summer beverage and Bud Light Wheat holds its own, but I’d never really go out of my way to get it.
But in living his life he was not very smart,
SanJAsKa: Yes indeed dear soul. We have been working to open up the last of the energy gates that are to see you all so very advanced in your evolution. We are now directly aiding all of you in your ascension processes, if such is your wish for us to do so. With the opening of these gates has come the opening of the energy gates in all of you; we have served to help many of you open up the higher and lower chakras that lie in your astral body.
I had something to protect
Bring back my gallows”
*For The King's Favor in the US
This program was envisaged to “create an enabling environment for cooperative management and development … through a limited but effective set of basin-wide activities and projects” (NBI, 2001).
Kate Spade Socks- I always need socks because inevitably my feet get cold. During the summer I bring a pair strictly for flight time- I don't care if they match or not, my feet will be warm.
Take your time to admire this fresco and then move to the cells, each of which is adorned with its own fresco. Before you leave, on the first floor, you stop by the book shop which is adorned by a fresco by the Ghirlandaio depicting the Last Supper.
Below is a short video of Jing Do which I began working with yesterday. I typically keep video notes, these are not for instruction, they are so I can remember and so instructors and fellow classmates can advise on technique Keep your comments constructive please.
The Brooks Pure Project line is now available in most Athlete’s Foot outlets; I got mine at the Belconnen shop. Oh, in case you didn’t notice, this is NOT a sponsored review.
Loaded up and ready for work and play... Bikes and tools!
Open Door Push-outs
Many stores now offer Gado - Gado dressing in dried blocks to which you simply add hot water, making it easier and cheaper to cook at home.
candlelight echoes
Perhaps you recall that at Occidental College – coincident with his grand political plan to fulfill Malcolm’s Dreams – “Barack Obama” insisted that “Barry” be ditched for Barack? A brilliant strategic move indeed. Barry sounds far too close to Bâri′. What if somebody, anybody, from his past, or from the present, or worst of all, in the future, caught on?
Note that I don’t own the 24/1.4G and can’t show a fair flare comparison but in my brief encounter the 24/1.4G showed some little flare in a situation (sun about 80° from the upper left) I wouldn’t expect so see any flare in the 28/1.4D.
Whatever you do, don’t miss a tall glass of piping hot Russian tea, accompanied by a pot of thick cherry jam.
The president’s signature legislative achievement, ObamaCare, never popular, now risks being overturned by the Supreme Court in late June. If the Court overturns the individual mandate or the whole enchilada, the president and his fellow Democrats are relieved of the burden of having to defend so unworkable and freedom-depriving a program.
I Say No To BLOGIARISM is my way of saying to everyone who copies & pastes, borrows, adds a frame, etc that it's UNACCEPTABLE. I am not a gal who beats around the bush. I am blunt & my husband says I am abrasivly blunt....and that's when I'm being nice.
And, so forth and so on… Do this type of interval training (also known as Tabata) for 20 minutes, and you’ll burn more fat and calories than you would if you jogged for 20 minutes. It’s intense! There is no set HIIT workout. You can google it and find more examples, but you can also make up your own. For the workout that suits your needs, pick the exercises you like the best for whatever body part you want to work on and incorporate those into your HIIT. That is the best way to start. As you get stronger and your endurance improves, then you should add exercises that are more challenging. Trust me, you’ll see the benefits right away!
Tuesday night at least I had a hockey game to look forward to. Blackhawks in the first round of the playoffs. All the games have gone to OT so far…. why should this one be any different?!
"My pain is ugly angel juan. I feel like I have so much ugly pain," says witch baby in a dream. "Everyone does," Angel Juan says. "my mother says that pain is hidden in everyone you see. She says try to imagine it like big bunches of flowers that everyone is carrying around with them. Think of your pain like a big bunch of red roses, a beautiful thorn necklace. Everyone has one."
I'm going to do a more detailed blog post next week sometime about branding, advertising, marketing and connecting with people, so I won't say too much on the topic now, but it boils down to this; you can be, or look, too slick. Professionalism is a good thing to cultivate, but self-promotion is annoying. I've never done formal very well - I wear a certain amount of scruffiness in my soul, and with pride - and ultimately I don't want to use marketing tricks to artificially boost my performance.
For those of you who have been following The Utter Blog for a while, you’ll know that my hair (or lack of it) is one of my biggest concerns in the run up to my wedding next year. For those who haven’t got a clue what I’m talking about and are now (naturally) assuming that I’m incredibly vain, you can catch up on Operation Get Good Hair (Part One)…. here.
--just sayin.
In large saucepan, combine all ingredients. Simmer over low heat 20 minutes. Makes 6 servings
Would you dumb down your resume? Is that something that is smart, today? Yes, I get it. Weird economy and weird times but WHY?
Show me the proof.
The great thing about this, is that it makes part of our job easier. We don’t have to be as clever, our memories don’t have to be as strong. The truth doesn’t change, even though our perceptions might. So even if you lose track of the truth, it’s not going anywhere, because it’s not something you thought up. You can always go back and find it. If you had some genius idea for a story but you forgot it, it doesn’t really matter, because the truth is still waiting to be told in all its infinite, kaleidoscopic, hilariously paradoxical simplicity. If you commit yourself to the truth, there will always, always, be something to write, and the ideas that come will be much harder to forget, because they will be attached to that sturdy latticework of a deeper and unshakeable theme…that of the human condition!
Pressure cook toor dal with 1/8 teaspoon of turmeric powder and 1.5 cup water until you get 2 whistles. Using the back of ladle or hand blender, mash the cooked toor dal to a coarse paste.
THE BREAKING POINT
I've officially gone crazy. Altogether I've spent 360 hours working this summer. And to top it off, I'm not even done yet. Now I don't want to complain, no one forced me to work this much but myself. I'm just so fed up, that going back to school in a couple of weeks actually feels like a vacation. I guess you just have to learn how to enjoy the little things,
We then catch up with Lilly drinking coffee in a diner. A male patron comes to her booth and starts aggressively hitting on her, although she shows absolutely no interest even telling a waitress the man is bothering her. He doesn't listen to the waitress and Lilly elbows him in the throat when he sits next to her.
I noticed an inferior car ahead of me which was not only in the BMW Lane of my motorway,
And so, instead of a last art post, I’m putting up a book review for A Virtual Affair, a near-future science fiction novel by Zvi Zaks. If you’re looking for a well-told story that deals with the ethical and emotional issues that an everyday person faces dealing with the miracles of modern technology, A Virtual Affair is for you.
My personal plan is to go to the top of the Mesa Cliff and fully be present and open as the solar eclipse passes over us. I will also take my phone (and crystals) and video tape it (if I can) and upload it to youtube.
Well, if you read my post below you know that this is my second attempt at the Nutshells challenge. yep it is what I get for trying to combine challenges. Well, I am happy with both results even if I didn't get to bed on time. Come on over this week to the Nutshells challenge blog and join in. There is a great prize and we are having fun. This week is Anything but a card. I tried this cute box and it was quite easy and turned out great.
How much does your life weigh? Imagine for a second that you’re carrying a backpack. I want you to pack it with all the stuff that you have in your life… you start with the little things. The shelves, the drawers, the knickknacks, then you start adding larger stuff. Clothes, tabletop appliances, lamps, your TV… the backpack should be getting pretty heavy now. You go bigger. Your couch, your car, your home… I want you to stuff it all into that backpack. Now I want you to fill it with people. Start with casual acquaintances, friends of friends, folks around the office… and then you move into the people you trust with your most intimate secrets. Your brothers, your sisters, your children, your parents and finally your husband, your wife, your boyfriend, your girlfriend. You get them into that backpack, feel the weight of that bag. Make no mistake your relationships are the heaviest components in your life. All those negotiations and arguments and secrets, the compromises. The slower we move the faster we die. Make no mistake, moving is living. Some animals were meant to carry each other to live symbiotically over a lifetime. Star crossed lovers, monogamous swans. We are not swans. We are sharks.
An array of wedding locations are available, ranging from the simple to the elegant, or one of the town's many ministers will come to you and perform a wedding at the location of your choice. An overlook on East Mountain, for example, provides a spectacular view of the valley and Victorian town and is popular for couples looking to marry surrounded by the beauty of the mountains.
About a year and half ago I got the quote "perfectly imperfect" tattooed on my foot. I've always been a self conscious person. I've struggled with weight issues and body image issues for such a long time, but it was about a year ago that I came to terms with myself, who I am and I'm finally comfortable with my body. The quote "perfectly imperfect" is applied to our everyday lives too. Things don't always go the way we planned, and things aren't always what we want them to be, but our life is PERFECT for us, even if it is imperfect!
randomly snaps fingers with bouncy step
5. MRSA is a disease can happen anywhere and can be avoided (no...no one in our house has it)
I entered the salon and approached the front desk. With a quick glance, I could assess I was the lone male in the salon. I gave the girl my name, and to my surprise (and pleasure), she said ‘Chris’ would be taking care of me today. Ah ha, I wasn’t the only man in the building, I had another male compadre. Oh, no I was wrong, Chris is a female Kris, back to my isolated male existence. I sat in the chair and started telling her what I wanted. I could tell by the look on her face that the ineffective jumble of words I strung together did a poor job of conveying what I wanted, so I took out my iPhone and showed her a picture (do people actually show pictures to their hairdressers??), I felt so lame (compounding my lameness was the fact that the picture was of Ryan Gosling, how stupid does it look to be like “here, can you make me look like the Sexist Man Alive, thanks”). I did like Kris though, she was short on small talk (I love that). Then as she snipped away it was perfect, not quite the style I asked for, but it looked fantastic. I should have said something, because she just kept cutting, and soon it was gone. A haircut worthy of my dread. Let me be clear it wasn’t Kris’ fault, she gave me what I asked for, but the style just didn’t fit my face or my head shape.
I work in a situation where I have little control over the students who come to me every year. I have no problem with this, though. What irks me, though, is the continued COMPARISON at the state level of charter schools versus traditional public schools. Charter schools that have been labeled “superior” versus my school that is now labeled “academic watch.” What I object to are the COMPARISONS made that allow for these offensive labels of our schools when they do NOTHING AT ALL to detail the nuances and complexities we are dealing with at schools like mine. Do NOT stack my school up against a charter school that has rigorous admissions standards and lotteries that qualify potential entrants based on geographic — and by default socioeconomic — parameters. Do NOT stack my school up against a charter school that requires active parent involvement. Do NOT stack my school up against a charter school that has the ability to remove repeat offenders with utter ease.
“Amen, amen, I say to you,
Quoth Carlon: 'Nay, I'd hold it treachery;
I'm not asking you back but I want you to remember me. Remember us. Don't forget how good it was, cause right now, only knowing that will I be able to feel a little better.
Open-Faced Chicago Ham Sandwiches
Target necklace
“C’mon Chels, this is nothing for you. You can do this!”
Elizabeth Warren, the Democratic candidate for the Senate in Massachusetts, has claimed for decades that she was of Native American ancestry.
They didn’t know my mom. She’s been there every day working tirelessly to help me regain function. Today I can move my left arm & hand and breathe on my own for short spans of time, because she fought for me when I had no fight. Without her help I’d have given up and chosen death. That wasn’t an option. She pushed, cajoled, and encouraged me. I owe her everything.
"Go home; rest yourself for a few hours and I'll see you all here later before the sun goes down. Whatever happens, I do have faith in you all".
We need sunshine.
On this tag, I used a stamp from TPS studio stamped with Staz-on ink. I used a little of Tim Holtz's Kraft Glassine paper to give the stamped sentiment a border. The Glassine really was a little tricky because the only thing that would adhere to it was glossy accents. The little pumpkin was cut out from K&Co's fall adhesive borders (I just loved the glitter on it!). Then, I used pop dots and a fiskar's scalloped punch to give it a little 'oomph'. I finished it off by going around the edges with Tim Holtz's distress inks in 'Ripe Persimmon'.
One of fun things about writing a booze-related blog is meeting lots of interesting people. Visiting imbibers usually end up joining me for a drink or two, which is how I found myself at Curio Parlor with Chris of SpiritsReview. Afterwards, Chris and his wife invited me to tag along for drinks at le 47.
No Dolls were harmed in the making of this production
At present, the raw sewage from the Bray squatters camp runs into the Molopo River which is the drinking water source for the area’s residents. Local farmers have complained verbally and in writing to the ANC-led municipality which says it can do nothing “because we do not have the money”.
In many states, registered sex offenders have to live a certain distance from where kids congregate, be that a school, day care center, park or bus stop. So these young men may have to move to the sticks.
Q.: Thank you so much for your time, Ty. Before you go, could you tell me about any projects you have in the pipeline we can look out for?
I'm not going to give you a recipe, because it's that easy! In the morning, turn your slow cooker onto medium and program it for at least 6 hours. I sliced up an onion, placed the pork on top and added about a 1/4th cup water to the pot. Cover and dinner will be ready when you get home.
I don’t think the CSO would be happy with this approach but it seems to me that the PTSB/ESRI series as represented by its historical indices closely correlates with the performance of the CSO indices.
and rainbow, even gravity
to following
but today was so perfect.
1 forgot
If you only have one type of hop on hand, you can still brew to style if you know the AAU of your hops. All you have to do is plug the known values into the equation to solve for the unknown values.
When you're sick for almost a whole month straight, looking at those simple moments that make you smile can make all the difference, because if it weren't for them you would probably spend the whole time in bed, feeling like a zombie. Or feeling sorry for yourself because you haven't gotten any better (which is so counter-productive and just makes you feel worse). I am so grateful for those around me who make each day better. Here are those simple smiles that have been filling up my life lately.
In Title III, the House Bill sets up the National Health Insurance Exchange. And as people like Ezra Klein have been saying for months, access to the Exchange is critical, because it sets the limit for how many people will have a choice to choose the Public Option. Under the House’s version, the Exchange starts small in the first year of operation (2013), including only firms that employ 25 people or less, and people who don’t get employer-based health care even after the mandate – which includes (explicitly) the self-employed, less than full time workers (an important group to add, given the fact that they tend coverage even when their employers offer health care to their workforces), and the like. In year two, this expands to firms that employ 50 people or less, and in year three, all firms with 100 or less. Importantly, the Insurance Commissioner can give firms with 100 members of more a waiver to get onto the Exchange – which means, among other things, that it is imperative that Commissioner be appointed by a Democratic administration in 2013.
-Corey. Human snuggie.
It is also cheering to receive lovely presents in the post, and this happened to me yesterday. The postman brought me a little package all the way from France, from dear Floss, whose Rentree Giveaway I was lucky enough to win.
2-3 good baking apples cored, peeled and diced
We are conditioned to treat ailments caused by artificial products with other artificial products, that, in turn, can cause other ailments. It is only by breaking this vicious circle that we can reclaim ownership of our brains and reach our fullest potential. So, today’s a new day: Put down the cheeseburger-flavored Doritos … and change your life.
Can I Really Go Grain Free?
ARTICLE I
15. Online stories can and probably should be different from print stories, if you have the time and the support of your news organization behind you. What are the three ways Harrower says to make online stories more readable?
Not only did The Life of Pi win the Booker Prize, it's an enjoyable, reasonably challenging read and a good introduction to the idea of the "unreliable narrator."
I am going to research Arizona laws to see if there is some ordinance in Tucson that prevents two parents tucking in a child at the same time. I hope you all know I am just being sarcastic here.
It is, the very woman, who now is responsible of moulding and inspiring the young, the importance of education and the importance of being able to get that job which pays for the roof over their head, the bills that comes like clockwork every time and the food that is put on the table.
Stan reaches rock bottom just before his thirtieth birthday and, as most of us are prone to do when we come awake to find ourselves ready to eat canned cat food rather than go out and face humanity, he decides he must change his life. Thus he begins a quest: to lose weight, to stop smoking, and to “Fall in Fully Reciprocated Love with the Woman of My Dreams.” The blog is born: a way to keep himself accountable, whether anyone else is listening or not.
Another example of an African Church that started in Britain and is involved in global missions is Trinity Baptist Church founded by Rev Kingsley Appaigyei in 1989. Trinity Baptist Church is also considered one of the largest Black Majority Churches in Britain having a congregation of around 3,000 people. Trinity Baptist Church since its inception has been involved in many Church plants within the UK and other parts of Europe. They have a Church in Italy, Denmark, Netherlands and Ghana. In addition, they also have an orphanage home in Ghana.
That grow for happy lovers.
on and heat it up, so you have a little more flexibility with it.
1 large tub frozen sliced strawberries, thawed
On telling her story to me, the girl started to cry. I sat her in the lounge and got her drinking water.
Fun Factor: Has the potential to be a massive party hot spot!
So, May the Sixth be with you!
I am convinced every pen has a person that loves it, this one just isn't for me. It has so many strikes against it that it's not funny but it is a Sheaffer and that is a plus.. Man hands... still funny.
-$100
Who cares, right now?
Book One: Out of the Silent Planet
Fanfiction time! Yay! I’m so excited!
Yeah, this post is late, sorry - I was busy.
I'm enjoying these last few weeks of summer, but looking forward to all that lies ahead.
But the new passenger had a story to tell. Choking tears back she told me that she had been in another taxi and she asked him to stop the car until she sorted the seat belt out which was jammed.
The FBI continued: “From August 1949 there were four cases among humans in New Mexico. Briefly, these four cases, one of which was fatal, were reported in New Mexico. Each case indicated that the victim had shortly before the illness, handled wild rodents which he had killed. The one case in New Mexico which was fatal was not diagnosed as the plague until after death.”
﻿I found this sign at a local furniture store
Justin
Nally was taken into custody after a SWAT team converged on his home at 1855 Orchard Lane. The home is in the north end of the county, off Route 8.
In the silence it is clear.
It’s similar to the long haul of the baseball season. Unlike football, where a team can go undefeated, even the best baseball teams are always going to lose many games in a 162-game season. And that doesn’t even count Spring Training games, because they don’t count. Not officially.
Any way I had a good day. I left Paul on his own as he didn't want to miss the GP highlights (no Sky TV for us).
What I want to say: What is wanting it too bad when it comes to bringing a life into the world? What does that even mean? Tell my doctor who is pumping the heck out of me with meds he can’t force it, because he feels otherwise. Oh and by the way, I am PAINFULLY aware of my lack of control in this situation, but thanks for the reminder.
Fallen Angel ... Hallmark Channel ... 2 AM
Good morning my friend.(We're not even Facebook friends, get on with it.)
"It's fantastical, but it's true," said their father. "And it's pretty amazing. Dr. Nine's a genius alchemist. He'd been working on it for years, and then he figured it out. But he doesn't tell anyone the secret, mind you, so don't go snooping around."
So how fast witll this mini-plane travel on the road, you'd think! Well, the Aptera team and the conducted test trials claim that top speed for the production model will exceed 85 mph, going from 0-60 in under 10 seconds.
So don’t worry about people from your past. There’s a reason why they didn’t make it to your future. ~ Adam Lindsay Gordon
The paper you use will make all the difference in your results, particularly when you're starting out and unsure of how to get the results you want. That being said, I've colored and blended on everything from good Gina K cardstock to watercolor paper. The smoother the cardstock, the easier it is to blend.
Dawn’s book makes it easy to laugh through all of the rough times of pregnancy but still makes sure you remember the joyful parts of it too – that the end result is a bouncing beautiful baby that’s yours for the making! And if you’re NOWHERE near the baby-making phase, this is a fun book to give as a gift too!
Power House Brewing Company
but by then I was on my way
So whether motivated by positive thinking or simple brain dysfunction, I decided to brew a Habenero Chile Stout feeling slightly confident I'd isolated the source of the contamination that soured my last brews. You may reasonably ask "Why on earth would you brew something like that?". I would like to answer the strong, roasty flavors of stout and stimulating Habenero chiles are part of my personality, vision, and creativity as a brewer. But the more honest answer is that agressively roasted malts and hot chiles are great at masking any off-flavors lurking around in the brew.
What highlights of past conferences come to mind?
There are Gifts of varying complexity and value, and coming soon, Spiders' own exclusive spidermetrix range of 'gismos' (ie, toys and stuff!) and from time to time, other ways to spend your hard earned points are introduced, like donations to worthy causes, special promotional offers, magazine subscriptions and so on.
This room was fantastic. That metal wall? It was an overhead door
Little did I know that this was only the beginning…
I wasn't looking for a new topcoat, as Seche Vite is great (and I have at least 6 bottles to use... it was on sale, okay?) but this came with the Polka Dots set that I recently picked up (they had sold out of the singles.) I had heard that the formula had been changed on this and a lot of the die hard fans didn't like it anymore so I had never tried it. It doesn't dry as fast as Seche Vite, but it is still much faster than any other topcoat and leaves a gorgeous glossy shine. It also is way less prone to shrinkage than Seche, which is a definate plus.
Anyway, enough ranting, needless to say the Green Dragon still felt like home, although reading over the Rogue FAQ on each table showed you that things will be changing.
This time of year everyone is focused on the big competitions – Rome, Paris, Zurich, Oslo, New York, Lausanne, London, etc. It’s those locations that have the big budgets and the ability to bring in the big names and provide the ticket buyer with the splashy results.
-MACHO MAN ELBOW FROM THE TOP ROPE ONTO JERICHO ON THE ANNOUNCE TABLE!
Perhaps the debate the fashion world is embroiled in should focus more on the fact that today's model's by classic facial standards are far outside the norm. The new look each season seems to go beyond classic standards of beauty to redefine what is interesting and stunning. In the mid 2000s we saw a sweep of doe eyed angelic almost alien like girls in the Prada invasion (think Sasha Pivovarova). Is it not the job of parents to look at these images and decide what is truly acceptable for their daughters and then frame it in a way that helps girls love themselves? Looking at todays models parents should be encouraging that their daughters that the women are interesting and unique--a characteristic that all women possess.
What do you all think out their in the cyber world? Is infidelity a private matter or does it somehow affect all of us in the spiritual realm?
Pasok appears to have lost second place to the Coalition of the Radical Left, or Syriza, which roughly tripled its share of the vote to 15.5%-18.5%. Syriza could end up forming a government if New Democracy fails to do so within 3 days.
But it’s a simple fact of evolution that separation is what has produced diversity.
My hubby has run the New York marathon but despite several attempts has so far been unsuccessful to get into the London Marathon. Knowing several people who have run it, we have heard it is very, very special marathon, which is huge fun to run, and you hear of some heart-warming stories of human endeavour and spirit. The crowd and atmosphere carries people around the mainly flat course 26.2 miles around the River Thames, and through the streets of London to the finish in The Mall alongside St. James's Palace.
When you reached for the report a co-worker was handing you, did he snatch them away at the last second and scream “MINE!” while shoving you backwards?
The type of statement on Heavy Metal that is useful for the culture and useful for the individual, in my opinion, is that which is qualified not with vague group-think mandates such as "Keyboards suck" but with exposition of actual personal experience. The risk involved in saying why one thinks this is so, is bound to humanize the statement (human beings, if allowed, cannot help but be human beings) and since we're all made of the same meats but in startlingly different permutations, clichés are weakened by this personalized exposition. The downside is that people can't do this in snappy, highly stylized pieces of snark in which the internet usually likes to converse, they'd have to write more in-depth and more at length. Well... that's a downside for twitter users mostly!
In his book Writing the Breakout Novel, agent Donald Maass points out that the most common mistake he finds in submissions is that the protagonist is unsympathetic. In an attempt to create flawed and interesting main characters, writers make them too dark and that can be “wearisome,” he says. Although he agrees that perfect individuals are not engaging and transformation can be very powerful in a story, redemption only comes at the end of a novel and readers may not stick around for that long. The key to make readers care, he says, is to balance negativity with sympathetic qualities and give dark characters “moments of humanity.” Maass offers the following tip: if a character is aware that he’s self-destructive, wrong or in trouble and makes an effort to change, the reader will remain engaged. The example he gives is Conrad Jarrett in Ordinary People.
The next morning while were having our lunch break, one of my friend went to me holding a piece of styro and said:
I am still stunned by tonight’s episode.
I am writing a PROPOSAL...
Persons accused of practicing the witchcraft were labeled as heretics. Once caught, the victim was coerced into confessing his crime through inhuman tortures and was either hanged or burnt alive during the inquisition. The law against the witchcraft was further exploited by the vested interests to score personal vendetta or to snatch the property or land of victims. Some influential persons in the society, in collusion with the priests, would manage to arouse suspicions against their targets as being witches or wizards. They victims were arrested, made to confess and killed.
Remember to forget me
34 Icy Demons - 1850
In order to take advantage of latest and greatest marketing for customer engagement, you’ll need a little thing that experts in the business call, “a plan.” That plan should have a list of items and a timeline of activities that occur before and after your latest and greatest opportunities.
Ryan and I are still counting down the days until peaches are back in season.... I know... we're a ways off. I really love making fruity little drinks (non-alcoholic, of course), and we became utterly addicted to my Roasted Peach Lemonade recipe last year. Ryan's parents have a wonderful peach tree in their backyard, and they'd send up a couple bag-fulls of beautifully ripe peaches every so often. So many peaches! Luckily we found the peach lemonade recipe to use them all up.
My opinions on this recipe: More seasoning. Next time I will add in garlic, minced onion, some jalapenos and maybe a few other spices. Overall, I would give this recipe a three out of five stars. That is because I am a marinara type of meatloaf person. However, my husband loved this!
“I think the recommended dose for her was like, one or two pills every six hours. She was taking four at least every two or three hours. It was scary and I would try to stop her, but she said it made her feel better. I didn’t know what to do.”
I first felt the feeling soon after I matched into my Harvard residency program. I worked so hard and accomplished my goal. I felt it again after my first marathon, NYC in 2010. And again after getting into the fellowship of my dreams. And again now.
Goodby Announces Scholarship
More than 60 U.S. insurance companies offer some form of income annuity, Baker estimates. “Twenty of them are on the CANNEX Exchange, and they represent about 70 percent of the U.S. income annuity market as measured by sales.”
2012.27
Differences of taste aside, it was helpful to hear the architects' vision for the market area. It will be interesting to see whether the hoped-for developments in usage occur, and how well the new granite and painted tarmac age. At the moment, the square remains a rather empty place and it may require further effort from the Council to change that. More positively, the number of market stalls has apparently increased since the changes so there are grounds for optimism.
-Psalm 55:19
(Revelation 22:8-9), and many others. Some of the angels described in the Bible
Maybe I’ll forget next year as well. Then, it will really be a “tradition.”
vi) as a member of the U.N., WIPO must comply with and be guided by the broad development goals of the U.N.;
Designed to fill a gap in the market and the demand for traditional methods rather than highly processed flooding the city centre. These units will focus on core products of French sticks, multi-grain loaves, rye breads, sourdoughs, rolls & bagels but can develop into patisserie & gluten free options.
When you are quick to react, let me teach you to be patient.
This week’s novel entertainment was brought to me by Bogart and the letters ‘P’ and ‘J’.
Use your designated sorting station daily to tackle incoming mail. First and right away, recycle or toss all junk mail, catalogs, or unwanted promotions. Shred any mail that might contain personal information (SS#, phone #s, medical record #s, etc.). Second, file all mail you need to save. Here are some suggested categories:
When the hoax fell apart, it exposed quite how flawed and quite how outrageous it had been, because of that, few realise quite how close it came to succeeding.
“Stupid dog, would you just shut up! Mum was right, should had gotten a parrot or something.”
Nikki wasn’t there
h/t: Grania Spingies
What would a leap of faith look like? What is it that is holding you back? Would it be so bad just to take that first step? Would it be so bad to stop and really honor yourself and at least listen to that longing?
Now, of course, such a statement will never be uncontroversial. But the fact that someone could make it was, to me, staggering. When I was studying for my doctorate in English at Yale, in the early 1980's, there were precisely two people in my class who had read Powys, I and Ian Duncan. We both thought he was terrific. Nobody else had heard of him.
From a Shenzhen perspective this article may be one of the worst pieces of reporting I’ve come across in a long, long time. Firstly it’s worth noting that as a serious Chinese employer, Foxconn employs literally millions of people – that’s right, Foxconn employs more people than some countries have citizens. This means that suicides amongst its workforce are not just likely, but almost a statistical certainty.
I don’t want to worry about the children’s photo albums not being complete, or think about what contributions I am leaving for the future generations. I am obviously not one of the Vanderbilts or a world leader that everyone wonders what I am up to next. sometimes I wish I was one of the movers and shakers of this time I live in, but I don’t know if that is a desire that comes from me or from all the outside pressure of the life we as a collective society live in today.
Global Governance
It was, he said, “a symbolic gesture to show it was possible to enforce legal principles against Zimbabwean government in South Africa”.
Myles Kennedy: Alter Bridge, The Mayfield Four
hot sauce for serving
When I heard people saying that today was the first day of Spring, the first thing I thought of was "Ooops -- I gotta get my Spring Reading Thing post ready." So -- a little late -- here we go:
I was
This procedure is not happening in some back-water of Africa or China or Afghanistan. This is Texas. These laws are not being passed in countries renowned for their Civil Rights abuses. This is coming from the birth-place of Civil Rights. This debate on whether Women are People is a reasonable question in the 21st Century.
Proof on the other hand is demonstrating that the mark was left by your shoe and that your foot was in it at the time.
Well she walked into the studio and I didn’t think much about it until I was told she was the model we were waiting for!!
Janeane Garofalo
1 six
Bring water to a boil and add in all the ingredients. Boil for around one hour. Best eaten if served chilled!
What is it about surrendering that scares the bejesus out of us? For anyone who believes in a Higher Power, we know that sometimes our self…our low ego…does NOT know what’s best for us and our growth. Did I say sometimes? I would bet MOST of the time is a better description. For clarification, let me explain that I see ego as the high ego and the low ego. The high ego is where we work from when we need to use our intelligence or logic for practical things like balancing our checkbook. The lower ego is a big ol’ bully. It thumbs it’s nose out us, tells us we are not good enough, that we can’t do this or that, projects it’s fears on us…get the picture? Okay, so that’s the part of our brain that holds us back when it’s time to surrender.
He is now 10 months old.
I firmly believe that any man's finest hour, the greatest fulfillment of all that he holds dear, is the moment when he has worked his heart out in a good cause and lies exhausted on the field of battle-victorious."-Vince Lombardi
That’s not all. After an overwhelming response last year, we’re going to give away a Mini Camaro that is wrapped to match its life-size version. Keep track of the progress of the mini-Camaro on our Facebook page.
my anniversary is on new year's eve so i thought it would be ok to use for this. Now that my friends i celebrate. hehehee! After diggin for about an hour i realized i have lots of glitter but not lots of heart stuff (lucky me) so this was the best i could do....
It's gotten a lot of admiration, from the coronel of the jail as I took it out, to definitely our kids here.
Elizabeth: I do much of the marketing, I find venues and I do power point presentations which dance around my story and give a historical perspective. One presentation is Constance de Hauteville and the Italy that Nobody Knows and the other is Italian Unification—It Didn’t Start When You Think It Did. My editors also find venues that I might speak at.
*Dance to 100 rap
seems exhausted
Paul’s appointment went beyond the Jews. It would have been fine with them if he had come to them for permission to go to the Gentiles. Of course he would have to take the same message they were preaching; that is, obedience to the Law of Moses. Israel, according to Old Testament prophecy, was to be the only channel of blessing for the Gentiles. Salvation was of the Jews, as the Lord said, Himself in John 4:22.
The pair claim such a set-up would allow second-lien holders to potentially recover more than they would have in a default.
I will never ever forget the heartfelt gratitude that came from this man when I met him in person. I was in awe, how could someone facing this insurmountable anguish find gratitude. I thought that this man was extraordinary. I came to realize that genuine deep felt gratitude was a common denominator among those left behind. A gratitude not felt by those left behind without the recourse of life insurance and holding the bills and the worry.
At the Dance of the Year competition, the entrants are sorted into teams of four members each. Hyemi is a team captain and for her first pick she takes Jason, then gets Samdong and Pilsook. Hyemi's team must do a "bird" themed dance, and they get some help from JYP as choreographer. But then the dance team starts studying videos of birds for inspiration--videos of SEAGULLS, specifically. Awkward, awkward, duck-n-flap seagulls. Please tell me you're not going to imitate these? But nope, they end up going with more of a swan theme.
July: Oscar Wilde
UNDER THE IMPACT of the economic crisis there has been a sharpening of national tensions within the eurozone. There are also divisions within the leadership of the German government, the key power in the eurozone. Merkel has faced growing opposition from leaders of the Bavarian Christian Social Union (CSU) and the Free Democratic Party (FDP), the Christian Democrats’ coalition partners. These leaders have been playing the euro-sceptic card, reflecting the growing opposition in Germany to bailing out Greece and other so-called peripheral states.
I'm still marinating with Eminem's latest work, so I'm just adding a couple extra nuggets/points of entry. But I do agree with Em being "one of the most crucial figures in pop culture in the last 20 years" and even more. So needless to say I'll be revisiting, probably often, but for now:
How? Life insurance will never be sexy, but it’s time to crawl out from under our rock, put on a new shade of lipstick and get asked to the big dance.
My best friend Lucie has started knitting dishcloths also, why Tricia and herself think I am to blame for roping them into the addiction that is dishcloths I've no idea rofl, when she shows some of hers I'll let you know and she's already done some wonderful ones.
Volker-Bräu, a resurrected brand from the 1930s, will be present with an oat and rye beer, both fermented with Kölsch yeasts. I have to say, I’ve not tried a proper German Roggenbier yet, so this might be a good opportunity, even if the yeast choice isn’t typical.
We can be so afraid of the unknown. Rather than looking at the changes as adventures, we worry about all the what ifs. It truly has been my experience that the “what ifs” my low ego comes up are way worse than physical reality. Surrendering, giving in to the Divinity within (and without) is nothing more than detaching from the outcome. It’s trusting that all is well no matter what….it’s taking the low ego’s wants, needs, and desires out of the picture. It’s taking all that no longer serves us out of the equation. Sounds wonderful, doesn’t it? Funny how knowing that, we still fear it.
Through the wailing of tempest
An old Greek word will end this topic....your guess is as good as mine.
Lotus team principal Eric Boullier said: “Jerome has been very patiently attending all the races and has been a conscientious and regular visitor to Enstone since he was announced as our third driver.
Brendan Jones, a forecaster at MeteoGroup, said he believed the tornado was caused a by ‘supercell’, a type of storm more commonly seen in the US in which the air inside is spinning or rotating.
So just as it is the case that cooker fixing, or even camel training, have nothing to do with Islam or the Koran, so we can say that science, when practised by a Muslim, has nothing to do with Islam or the Koran. Even the oft-quoted passage in the Koran about ‘searching out knowledge as far as China’ does not lead directly, or even indirectly, to science and knowledge. Not only that, they are exclusively about religious knowledge anyway. It would be silly to say that there is even a smidgen or genuine science or even philosophy in the Koran.
#3 CALORIES IN MUST BE LESS THAN CALORIES OUT. If you are trying to lose weight doesn't matter how you do it, this simple rule applies - ACROSS THE BOARD! Do you know how many calories you consume vs use in a day? Find out. I believe knowledge is power with this one!
The reason Miss King has a special place in my memories down all these years is because of her kindnesses to that young girl who lived across the street from her. Miss King travelled overseas a few times and each time she brought some small gift back to me which I’ve treasured to this day: a little Welsh dragon, a Japanese-print handkerchief and a miniature Chinese doll.
So, I will now capitulate and sit down in front of my blank screen and wait for the story to reveal itself. It’s the only way to do it and frankly, at this stage, I’m so heavily pregnant with story that if I don’t, I’ll probably explode. And we all know how messy that might be - chocolate and vanilla will be splattered everywhere!
And I’m still trying to figure out how best to get my sister here from the airport.
A few examples of property available through the portal include a three bedroom house in Jerez de la Frontera, built to 95 square metres, available for 33,000 euros, which includes a discount of the initial prices of 76%.
3) Stir in milk and heat. Do not boil.
We get an hour to see all of our team; PT/OT/ST/SW/RN (physiotherapy~Kim/Kelly, occupational therapy~Beth/Lorie, speech therapist~Sukaina/Susanne, social work~Gert and nurse~Julia/Elaine). We get some face to face time, we have developed a relationship and an opportunity to ask questions or make plans. It is also an opportunity for Nickolas to foster this relationship and show off what he is doing.
of their current 9-tee line, the only one i can maybe relate to enough for purchasing... ok, well, none of them. and i even like Joan Jett by a lot. but for personalized feel, these "i" lyrics aren't really doing it for me.
Please consider turning off word verification and if you wish to screen your comments use the comment moderation system instead. This makes it easier for the DT to leave you comments and with many of us having problems with Blogger, it really would make a difference to us.
Onto the forest! I head east, and am accosted by a talking crow, which will give me "advice" for 1GP. Cheaper than a lawyer I guess. He tells me to go north, and that he needs 30GP to pay Yaztromo to turn him back into a human again. But he's a talking bird! I could go back to Yaztromo, ask him to turn me into a talking bird, and be done with this book forever, 'cause no page 400 is going to beat that.
oil...I toast it until light brown and add to salad.
Being alone all weekend has been really hard for me. It's my own fault - I have known for quite some time that Billy and my sisters would be gone this week and neglected to make any plans. I just forgot how stressed I get when I don't have any grownups to talk to. Friday afternoon was fine. Saturday was OK. This morning, eh. By this evening, I was ready to throw myself off a bridge. The kids weren't being particularly bad. I just had so little patience by that point. And I knew it was me - my "gas tank" was empty.
11) Women in Ministry Series: All Are Invited to Talk I struggle as a woman in a conservative church. Do I stay and work for change? Or do I escape to enjoy freedom elsewhere?
- Must have basic computer skills.
1/3 cup heavy cream
Christy Hemme interviews Angelina Love. Madison Rayne has her rematch tonight. She also might have her “bodyguard”, Angelina expects it, because she will have some backup of her own.
*Note : After converting, the butter to be used is 150g to 110g of flour. I made the adjustment as I feel that I might get a butter overdose if I add that much. Also, the original recipe called for roughly 67g of sugar, I reduced t0 55g to cater to my family's taste.
"You won't be rich until Mother dies."
That’s correct, especially when personnel costs account for the great majority of Fire Department spending. And if tax revenues don’t pick up, Schulte may have to further slash spending and employees from other agencies while holding firefighters harmless.
Today (so far) has been better. The seas are still confused, but have settled down some and we still have good wind. Hopefully, things will continue to improve and we will have a great sail tonight.
The ones we’re most impressed with are Smart Stay and Direct call. Direct Call lets you dial a number by lifting the phone up to your ear while browsing contacts or reading/composing a message.
In the ambiguous language that the Congress so loves to employ in all things unconstitutional, we can translate that to the parental favorite, “Because I said so.”
and the needles
Wooo, I am finally able to say that I am a proud owner of a Dooney & Bourke handbag :) I received a Disney gift card for my birthday (not this past one, but last year) and was waiting for the right time to use it. The Disney online store just held a fabulous "friends & family" sale, so I made sure to jump on the opportunity!
Nearby the river were dried up flower beds with signs that promised certain species of, I assume, lovely foliage. I'll definitely be out here again as the weather warms up and things begin to sprout.
Just something to think about.
Since 2003, after London, Birmingham has attracted more Chinese investment projects than…..
“Michael, all the kids are getting one. You don’t want Zachary to feel left out, do you?”
And that’s what bugs me about the whole running skirt thing.
Then go over to Staples or a similar office supply store and ask them to print off an engineer print. They come in multiple sizes. I picked the one that fit closest to the poster frame I had purchased from The Mart.
Lunch Homemade roasted red pepper and tomato soup
I feel men really need to work at truly understanding how women communicate through their body language and by using nonverbal cues and/or hints to be successful in getting women and engaging them. But often when men have their eyes on a prize they don’t stop going after it until it’s either obtained or until it’s solidly not available to him (through directly being told she has no interest). Some men don’t even pursue the prize (although it’s there for the taking) b/c they cannot read a woman’s interest.
where the 2012 National Christian
The person whose writing I am rejecting once again (after engaging in a longer discussion and a more polite rejection last time around) has allowed television to ruin his life without even watching it, I guess.
Salary: $41,532 – $49,980 Title: Digital-Photo-Video Laboratory Supervisor Category: Science and Research Department: Art Date Posted: 03/03/2012 Final Filing Date: open until filled Schedule: 8AM – 5PM Position Information: The Art Department at UC Riverside offers a wide range of traditional and contemporary art practices with Digital, Photography and Video Art as an important part of the program. This position has a vital role as an Analog Photography, Digital Imaging and Video Laboratory Supervisor supporting instruction and creative activities in a busy and diverse community. Under general direction, supervises, maintains and manages analog photography, video and digital imaging laboratories in the Art department. Responsibilities include inventory and maintenance of highly technical equipment. Orders supplies within established budget and processes ink billing, camera rentals and loans. Supervises and trains student lab assistants. Ensures compliance with health and safety standards. Assists with digital archive and website. Works with faculty to recommend and implement long range planning. Minimum Requirements:
fret = it's a parent's job - one of the perks
Paneer - 100 g, cut into 1" inch cubes
Race Report:
He said he wasn’t calling the students pansy-assed, but the walk-out. Sure. I really don’t see how you can twist it that way – he was definitely referring to the students.
(1) What the Founding Fathers envisioned for America.
And I allow myself to believe
Alternative universes may be separated from ours by a miniscule spacial distance, although in one of a possible seven other dimensions than the three we are used to as a result of quantum splits.
A few notes: The fingers will spread in the oven so be sure to roll them quite thin. Also, if a few of the almonds fall off after baking, try gluing them them back on with the red colouring paste.
1/2 cup low-fat buttermilk
This year I had a big project on- the front garden.
They are all decked out in "get wet" gear.
I buy frozen packets of organic wild blueberries, which last a while. Jacob doesn’t seem to like the fresh kind very much, which is weird but useful as fresh blueberries perish quickly and are more expensive than the frozen kind.
As it was the Balloon Fiesta in Bristol and the weather was not that brilliant, we didn't think that we stood much chance of seeing many hot air balloons over this way. However, on several occasions we looked into the sky from our road and saw great clusters of them floating slowly in the distance and we could hear the burners as they boosted their height. Radio Bristol announced that 62 took off together.
But what's happening at the lounge you say? i dunno, had this idea for writing a story for every song on Viva Hate, the first Morrissey solo album but since that would take to fucking long i figured i'll only do a few, got ideas for two of them so watch out for those kids, i'm sure you're all waiting anxiously, practically bursting with anticipation for that, got some other stuff i'm gonna get around to as well, finish that Fathers and Sons bit and what not but well i'm just rambling now ain't i?
"We adapt, or would you rather be in the Watch wearing a suit of steel?" Arawn asked playfully.
2:00 pm
and the load of children tedious).
We have had the most extreme weather and as a result some very severe flooding. About 80% of our state of Queensland is in flood, that's crazy! So whilst our house has been fortunate enough to escape the flooding, friends and family have not been so lucky.
The Church's role in economics is not new - it goes back over 700 years! San Bernardino of Siena (1380–1444) was the first theologian after Olivi to write an entire work systematically devoted to scholastic economics. But, he was not even the first, illustrating that the Church's involvement in political and social life was (and is) necessary to sustain a culture with a proper ordering.
Muhammad Sha’ani said that the scenario was likely as a standard uniform would not allow the public to distinguish the various agencies.
Our server spouted the glories of the fettuccine Alfredo like Romeo mooning over Juliet's beauty. Home made pasta, a blend of four cheeses, sauteed garlic in olive oil ...he guaranteed it to be the best fettuccine Alfredo we'd ever taste. It came close. The mozzarella di bufala (soft Italian cheese made from water buffalo milk) could’ve been blended in more. As it was, the big globs were a bit hard to swallow but overall, this was a fine plate of pasta.
Detective Conan 808 (30:44 – 32:01)
The park is the same odd mix of tropical and dry plants that we had around Mataranka. It's interesting to see and not what i expected. I'm used to national parks being full of tall trees and dense undergrowth but all the bush out here is low trees and dry grasslands. Lots of little creeks though. We saw all the massive magnetic termite mounds but we drove straight past this time.
Muhyiddin’s announcement is pertinent as it gave an indication of how the issue has been resolved.
Exposure: Full sun, Partial shade
But I would say – we have lived above our dear downstairs neighbours for nearly 20 years now, and kept them dry. That includes the birth, brief life, and death of Helen and David’s son Oliver, who had Down’s Syndrome and was born and died here in Edinburgh. Been there, done that, when it comes to keeping neighbours dry through pain.
You may also be interested in Alvin Plantinga’s epistemological argument from reason, which is related to this argument. It shows that even to have the ability to think, you have to have a certain anthropology and you have to have mental faculties that are designed for reason, not survival.
On another note, I want to let you all know that we received more than 100 applications for our open Design Team positions. Yowser!!! Let me tell you that I seriously wish I could have you all on our team! This is the hardest part of issuing a design team call... I don't want to disappoint anyone, and I appreciate how much time and effort you put into applying and then waiting to hear. Trust me, I've been on the other side countless times... some I got, others I didn't. All I can say is please don't take it personally if you aren't selected. It isn't about that at all, even though it might feel like it. Besides, I firmly believe... and have told myself this when I wasn't selected for a particular DT... that when one door closes, another opens. It's true. I know this from my own experience.
Ethan Nash
The man adjusted the bag and shook his head slowly.
Anyone wishing to deny these statements about the meaning of the cogito need merely prove that something, anything, is true. By all means, give it a try, dash your head upon it, but it can’t be done. Cogito ergo sum, however, isn’t the endpoint of inquiry, it’s the starting point; it’s a tool that helps us see, without intermediaries, exactly what is true and what isn’t, and that puts it right up there with fire and the wheel.
I've change the image, one colour (used red instead of sage), added paper and a sentiment and embossed instead of stamped the vertical panel.
Another Perez bonanza! The story in this particular issue is fairly pedestrian – the team battles elementally powered villains – but that cover! Just a fantastic, team shot featuring several of the group’s biggest names. Like #15 on this list, last year, I found this image on a book cover! A random choice, but good eye!
Me: YOU GUYS ARE AWESOME!
Luzon Monastrell/Syrah blend- This blend was warm and peppery with a one-two punch of heady red fruit, a hint of mint and a resiny, almost pine-like undertone. It was hot, but clean and not at all overwhelming despite it’s 14% content.
Here's a Queen Kat Designs stamped image. I saved a "tree" by using a cutting of lace leftover from another project, as well as making my own flowers out of punched circles cut from small pieces of double-sided patterned papers from my stash.
In ancient Greek times in dying a person might be strewn into the sky as stars… to become a constellation. Cassiopeia; the Pleiades; Gemini. Invisible by day, hidden in the sunlight. At night, brightly visible. I believe John was scattered into the sky as stars … and if you look tonight perhaps you can pick out a new constellation in the never ending tapestry of stars.
People talk about environmental footprints, but the environmental footprints of different groups who make up a population tend to differ dramatically. In California, for instance, within the right-wing of the Sierra Club, and amongst anti-immigrant groups, there’s this belief that a huge tide of immigration from Mexico is destroying the environment, and that all these immigrants are actually responsible for the congestion and the pollution – but that's absurd. Nobody has a smaller environmental footprint, or tends to use public space more intensely, than Latin American immigrants. The real problem is white guys in golf carts out on the hundred and ten golf courses in the Coachella Valley. In other words, one retired white guy my age may be using up a resource base ten, twenty, thirty times the size of a young chicana trying to raise her family in a small apartment in the city.
That would be the £5 free gift in the month of your birthday, and it's my birthday this Saturday!
It went viral, however, because she was the one who passed it around. Sending it to people like Dan Savage, a popular Seattle-based blogger and nationally syndicated sex advice columnist.
2 cups vegetable broth
4. Paint
One of my classmates in English class during my junior year hailed from the country of England (or Great Britian…or the United Kingdom…I can never keep them straight). She sat next to me so I was in a perfect place to hear one day in class as she turned to the boy behind her and politely asked, “Do you have a spare rubber I can use?” The boy was dumbfounded by this quite forward remark and my all-too-innocent ears were also quite shocked by this request…
Place the dipped patties in the refrigerator to set the chocolate, about 20 minutes. Store coconut patties in a airtight container in the refrigerator for 1-2 weeks.
It seems that Hone's strengths as mayor came as a direct extension of his role as New York's social network king. He's as known as much for his parties as for his policies. The introduction to his diaries doesn't even bother to disguise this: "Mr. Hone represented the city socially as well as politically. He entertained officially; and visiting strangers during his term enjoyed a hospitality which reflected credit upon the whole community."
And realized how horribly out of control it is. It's super thick and grows equally on both sides. I really didn't feel like pulling it (especially in rain and wind) so I took thinning shears and chopped it off. There is a reason you should NEVER DO THIS. Think cross between a Thelwell's pony and a Norwegian Fjord. Yeah. Do I care enough to fix it? Probably not. Not until I actually have to put it in braids.
This one will be short.
Also suspended, PCW’s Queen of Extreme Valora Salinas and the Mercenaries (Dawn McGill and Svetlana Kovalevski) for their ‘despicable attack’ on the Hollywood guests.
I am to awaken at a time unpleasant to me, and go, exhausted, to an unpleasant place the stranger determines, and then for a period of hours, also determined by him, I must do tasks that humiliate me and tax my physical and mental limits. He treats me like a slave and a child, telling me when I can come and go, where I can come and go, when I can eat, how long I have to eat, when I can go to the bathroom, and when this daily period of punishment will finally end.
Now, this is what you call political stratagem – a cleverly contrived trick for gaining an end.
The ANC says it is "extremely disappointed and puzzled" by a high court decision refusing it leave to appeal an earlier finding on the singing of a controversial struggle song containing the lyrics "dubul’ ibhunu" (shoot the boer).
If you have any Colby Rasmus cards not listed here, please get in touch. I'd be happy to work out a trade.
I actually called it quits after the 3rd loop and started up Johns truck and enjoyed the heated seats for a while. After getting out of the frozen wet clothes and into some warm dry ones I decided to head back out rather that sit around waiting for him to finish.
9: fight for life 8:30
The joy of watching Buster Keaton is something that can be matched by few other film experiences because, while he may have been known as the "Great Stone Face," he knew how to make even the smallest of gestures hilarious. Inspired by the legendary Hatfield-McCoy feud, Our Hospitality is a film that mixes slapstick and Southern manners to great effect, taking a simple premise and getting a lot of mileage out of it without ever running it into the ground. After nearly 100 years, Keaton remains an artist that few can top.
Noice. Safe. Classy.
The holiday season is fast approaching and I find myself in a deep funk about it. I saw the cutest halloween costumes online the other day and they made me so sad. I kept picturing Austin wearing this big bowl of mac and cheese and Eli being a package of wonder bread, lol. They would've been so adorable together. Now, I can't seem to figure out what Austin will be because I pictured them going as a pair this year :-(
Love isn't something that should change me for the worse. It shouldn't make me compromise what is good in me. It shouldn't make me angry or scared or worried.
Improved graphics, AI, environments as well as new atmospheric soundtrack
Austin: Is there anything else I can help you with today?
JUDGE: Simon Armitage
And keeping with this simple fabric theme (if you can call eyelet simple) these eyelet pillowcase dress have me longing for the beach in summer time. I just love the classic feel of eyelet. It is so soft and beautiful. And the pop of color in the ties that these mamas choose is my kind of adorable.
Call your local McD's to make sure that they have these coupon booklets. If they don't have one in your city, check neighboring cities for these FABULOUS coupon booklets for $1.
and the lucky winner will receive some fab digi images as their prize. Do pop over to the shop as there are some great pre-coloured images to buy which definitely helps if you are short of time!!
It amazes me that some of you are finding time to make stuff, take photos of said stuff (good ones too) and then write entertaining blog posts about it too. You have my admiration, laydeez.
The biggest problem so far is most of the information relating to the characters, and the loosely strung together plot, is relayed to the audience secondhand. We’ve been rarely shown anything aside from Koko’s business practices, which doesn’t really do much good for a series with such a large and varied cast. Again, it’s not a glaring issue at only three episodes in, but continuing like this will make future developments seem token and hollow, regardless of how vital they are to the plot.
1. Internships mean more than a line on a resume.
Thank you again. It was a week full of love. Your love gave us strength.
I may even chuck in a packet of Koko (unopened) depending on how hungry I get.
They are typically under $8 a pop, I know my CVS and Walgreens is running all Revlon products BOGO 50%! Throw in a coupon and you've got a great deal on a great product.
My boyfriend Paul seems to be on a home improvement trip lately. His house is immaculate - Magnolia walls, clean and tidy. Pretty much a blank canvas... Zzzz.
JSB—You mentioned pinpoint lights also.
Earle was arrested and put in the Pickens County second-floor lock-up.
The Bruce family were the original and builders of Kinross House, the Montgomery family owned the house until quite recently. The Montomery’s are buried in a separate,private grave yard which adjoins this burial ground. This image was toned in a different way, the organic material picking up a blue tone.
12. Phone Booth 3'45
I will be posting Thanksgiving Day recipes probably on Friday night. Up for the making:
I think writing is inherently political, whether writers choose to explicitly engage with political issues or not. To not engage, not look, not say, is equally political. Being part of a larger culture means everything we do has wider consequences than our own immediate impulse or desire. Driving to the shops instead of walking is a political choice, so is eating industrially produced and disseminated food versus locally grown, organic food. So is thinking and teaching and everything else I do. How can writing not be implicated and engaged? It can’t. What’s the writer’s role? I think we all have the same obligation, whether writers or artists or any otherwise: to make our choices conscious and explicit, informed and compassionate. To see our actions as part of a web of associated choices and actions. Think globally, act locally, hold the policy-makers’ feet to the fire.
Half of the students were given a pint of beer to drink, while the others received the same volume of water after the workout. Subsequently, the team measured their hydration levels, motor skills and concentration ability.
White Opal Liquid Pearls
The limestone formations were formed when lime-rich fragments of dead marine creatures were deposited on the seabed, then overlaid by weaker layers of soft mud and clay. These seabeds were then forced to the surface by tectonic action. When the sea is just right and under currents are at their fiercest the water is forced through eroded caves below the formations and sent skywards like a jet, many metres into the air. At the time we were there, the sea was calm and collected.
In Mexico the drug mafia cripple and kill the local police and government. The death squads come in the nights, and the victims are beheaded before sunrise. Their mistake: The corporate with the police or government.
At the very least, I arrived safely in FL with a handful of story I
The truth is her arrival in Canada is illustrative of the problem of the system. We are bringing in too many immigrants than the economy needs. The jobs are not there at least not the good ones. She should not have been allowed entry and permanent residency but her being her does provide work and government funding for the like of Metropolis BC and S.U.C.C.E.S.S. and that is what this is really all about, not the over all benefit of the country.
I was thrilled to see Zuzana back up and running! I immediately jumped up from my computer and completed her ZWOW # 11. (I think?? The one with the mule kicks.) And I was a sweaty mess before the clock struck nine!
I highly suggest this read. Especially for those all for the supernatural and even ones that haven’t gotten into the genre before.
The youth are uniting and exchanging ideas using the internet, a technology that can no longer be withdrawn without a clear change in the system and a move by governments toward the form of authoritarianism that currently reigns supreme in China. The appeal of the Humanitarian Socialist Party is to the British people in this time of revolt, do not let the media spin your message and make it into a message of the same old demand for economic justice and therefore something that is a relic of the 20th century concept of socialism which you have been lead to follow by the old left. Use this opportunity to reject the right and left and create a civilization that would set an example for the rest of the world to follow.
For a balanced view on juicing basics, I found this article extremely helpful. For us, the decision to juice came from the general life-changing decision to eat as many whole foods as possible, limiting the amount of processed “dead” food as possible. Juicing was just one (fun!) way toward that goal.
Help your colleagues to raise their awareness of the needs of whoever uses the result of their work, and to seek to meet those needs. It’s often the simple things that count in changing attitudes.
and I knew Eve like no other
Impressive!"
First, Chip and Dale Rescue rangers, this one I used to watch when I was very young! This one started in 1989 and got in 65 episodes until it ceased in 1990.
Here is a card I made for my friends birthday, I really like making cards in the pink, brown and cream colour combo they always look nice.
3. Cut your fabric so that it covers the toilet paper roll. If you want you can add fray check so edges of your fabric won't fray otherwise you can leave it.
Why is that? It is because moral outrage is unprincipled; it cannot gauge itself against values or ideals. There is nothing illiberal about removing someone from a mailing list; if anything it is to exercise choice itself, the very essence of liberalism (the alternative being that the DA has no choice, that the media will determine its communications agenda). Nor are there any implications for transparency. The DA is not hiding anything from Majavu. She can read our comment on our website (where all our statements are posted) or in the papers the next day.
What makes fame so alluring to audiences and yet so disillusioning for the object of fame? How have the criteria for what deserves or attracts fame changed in different historical eras? What makes people famous? Is it their exemplary conduct as public figures? Or is it their uncompromising resistance to a social paradigm which is trying to absorb them? The Frenzy of Renown is both a who’s who of western history’s heavyweights and an insightful exploration of the human urge to be recognized.
and I'm ready to create a simple, dreamy, rustic, Nordic Christmas atmosphere
Dear Turtle Wax Oxy Interior1,
Rather, my reasons for being interested in flat ontology are far more anthropocentric. It is my view that we cannot truly understand human societies and political structures so long as the marked space of theory consists entirely of norms, signifiers, meanings, and signs. So long as we are doomed to focus on these alone, we are also doomed to pose the wrong sorts of questions when analyzing the social field and strategizing political action. What I wish to draw attention to by carrying out a “cross” over the boundary of the distinction between meaning/non-meaning is the role played by nonhuman objects in human collectives.
We didn't tell everyone that I was adopted; close friends and family knew, and it was never kept a secret, but we didn't bring it up to casual acquaintences unless the conversation led there. When someone would say that I had mom's eyes, she and I would share a secret smile. She would say, "yes, she does." In those moments, I could so clearly feel the love between us. It was as if only she and I knew that while I didn't get her eyes genetically, I was so much her daughter that the resemblance was unmistakable just the same.
1 roll of duct tape to silence sentries
“Are you making fun of me, kotik?”
As I approached the trees I slowly opened my palms. She just sat there and didn't move! Then for some reason only the universe knows; I began stroking her wings with my index finger. She sat down in my palm and relaxed! I stroked her again and said "Hello." in a whisper of amazement....
This weekend we took a trip on the "Santa Train" with the Georgetown Loop Railroad. We had some groupons for it, and so we brought the whole family - us, Aunt Mary and my parents! All together 5 adults, 3 kids, and 2 wheelchairs as part of that. I called in advance to make sure we could all go, and the assured me we could - so we did.
He smiles and takes another bite. They continue walking.
The print of the woods was my 90 year old neighbors.
It is WIPocalypse time again. I am happy to report that I have two new finishes to add to the list.
I am hearing... The tv on and cars going by outside in the street.
For the past two years I have been treated for depression and doing, as always, everything for my children. Last November my body decided to no longer accept attempts at different prescriptions to assist me. I have been off work since the end of that month, dealing with various side effects and withdrawal. I have been hospitalized 4 times in the last 4 months.
Here are the requirements:
Along with that exciting news, I found out that I will be attending the Summer Craft and Hobby Show (CHA) in Chicago, IL in July (just 2 weeks after Italy)! My first time at the trade show with a manufacturer!!! SO very exciting! I can't wait to meet people I have only "talked to" online and meet my other DT girls! I will be working the DMC Faber-Castell booth there. I will be doing a make-n-take project and helping at the booth and workshops. It will be very exciting and very busy! I can't wait! I have lots to do to get projects ready for the show! I am planning to stay an extra day to explore the museums there and have a little "me" time too... ;)
2) Select one or more fonts to use in the transformation
Not knowing what to expect, we each took a sip of our beers. Now I wish I recorded a video of this, but I didn't so I'll recall what happened to the best of my ability. Tom's facial expression went from overjoyed and ecstatic, to really weirded out and completely disgusted in a matter of seconds. I'm going to be completely honest with you here; Bramble Rye is the result of a beer experiment that went...wait for it...awry. I feel like the wonderful people over at Bourbon County Brewing were feeling extra inventive the day they came up with Bramble Rye; unfortunately the combination of flavors doesn't really work. Rye and berries? No thanks.
When, if ever, does it stop? Where, if anywhere, is the line drawn? I want to know what has to be done in order for this to stop; not for it to get better, not for it to decrease but to STOP. I don’t care if that’s unrealistic, because it shouldn’t be. It shouldn’t be an unrealistic goal to live without fear of being attacked, raped, or worse. I shouldn’t have to double, triple-check to make sure my door is locked at night, and neither should you.
Last Christmas when Granny asked what Popps would like for Christmas, I jokingly said "a box of crap", but Granny went off and fulfilled the request and at Christmas she delivered "The box of crap". filled with glue sticks, hole punches, string, sticky tape, feathers, face paint, throw in some bottle top lids and you are set. A girls dream box.
Turn to the Pros. Another great way to get rid of writer's block is to read or watch material that you find to be exceptionally well written or clever—something you'd like to mimic or could create some sort of spin off. This can include anything from reading books, blogs, magazines, and newspapers or even watching movies. Whatever you choose, just make sure you're paying close attention to themes, writing style, voice, dialogue and rhythm.
While the Fluence Z.E. is indeed a potent electric offering from the Frenchman, capable of handling our daily needs, the lack of local infrastructure still poses a huge gap in bridging the reality and the eco-dreams.
So for now, I'm figuring I'll do one thing at a time and hope I really can fit it all in. I think my biggest downfall is going to be constantly watching the clock in fear of the day actually ending.
You thought Return of the Jedi ended with Rebels smiling and Ewoks happily drumming on Stormtrooper helmets while they feast on Darth Vader's chargrilled corpse, didn't you? Oh, you. A new post-credits sequence shows the ghost of Emperor Palpatine laughing maniacally before flying up the reactor shaft towards the camera whilst shooting lightning from his hands. Did somebody say... TRIquels?!!
The second surprise was just how hard a topic this was to research. My last nonfiction book, Up Before Daybreak, Cotton and People in America was challenging because it covered such a long time period. I (naively) thought that limiting my topic would make writing Titanic easier. Nothing could have been further from the truth. There are so many stories contained in this event, and I found myself going back again and again to primary sources but also needing to ask questions about the motivations and point of view of each person whose words and story I included.
Place chocolate chunks in a microwave safe bowl, and melt chocolate on high power for 60-90 seconds or until the chocolate is melted and smooth. Stop every 30 seconds, and stir. Take care not to burn chocolate by overcooking.
Persuasion (Jane Austen)
Step 6
When Family at the Foot of the Cross made a similar snack, they actually counted out 153 goldfish crackers because that's how many fish the apostles caught. Sounds like a fun counting activity to me, and a great way to learn a bible story!
4) Write 7,500 words of new fiction. - I'm standing at 1,722 words for the month right now which is almost exactly on pace. I'm hoping to get one good writing day in this weekend and get several thousand words written.
in my bright, sunlit kitchen
Or you are a beautiful song?
In Golden Gate Park, one of the most lovely places you can walk around is the National AIDS Memorial Grove. A lot of people don't even know it's there, but it's a gentle and serene place where the spirit is soft and comforting. There is a dell of redwood trees, and well tended paths that are always quiet and peaceful.
Tilda has been coloured with a combination of ProMarkers and FlexMarkers and I’ve teamed her with some fabulous papers from the Echo Park Springtime paper pad and also from the Yellow Papermania Capsule Collection. I’ve also used black card from my stash, my nesties, a Tim Holtz border die, a mix of stamps from a Woodware set and a Paula Pascual Personal Impressions set, ribbon, flowers from WOC, hatpins from The Ribbon Girl, gems and pearls from Kanban, Memento Tuxedo Black and Dandelion inkpads and a Brilliance Graphite Black inkpad.
He looked around, and to his surprise, he saw a white rabbit in a tuxedo jacket and a red bowtie holding a gold watch fob chained to the pocket of his jacket.
Last year myself along with several other members from our church went to Liberia Africa. At the time this was my third trip to Liberia. On this trip we visited with Danny Buegar who was the pastor of the United Christian Church of Monrovia. This is a church of 200 members. Their church building was simply made of some bamboo and thatched roof. During the rainy season the members would get wet during the service. But really to know more about this church you need to know more about Liberia.
much gratitude to Sparky, Outlaw Johnny, and the crew. you made my first tattoo a memorable experience. and thanks to Bob for sharing it all with me....neither of us squeeling even a little bit :-)
2013- Calvin “Megatron” Johnson: To be determined. Good luck Megatron, but it’s not looking good.
Seriously though. Sometimes it is difficult for a writer to write his or her own query. The writer is very close to the material and can’t often see the forest for the trees. If you’ve struggled with the query writing process, I don’t think it’s playing unfair to have another person write the query on your behalf, or with you, or revise it for you. As long as you end up with a strong letter that you believe fully represents your work, I, as the agent, will not ask if you wrote your own query letter. It can be your own deep, dark secret.
Still going strong and feeling great! In Kris Carr's book, Crazy Sexy Diet, where this cleanse is outlined, she offers supportive affirmations for each day. Today's affirmations are all about dealing with the naysayers and the judgement of others. I have to say, her words of encouragement on this topic came at the best time. I'm not doing this to make anyone else happy. This is for me. If you have an opinion of the choices I've made, you can keep them to yourself. I don't need them.
And, these cold, and rainy days, are definitely not helping.
Horde zeppelins also sell ice cream.
Proposition one above is obvious and doesn’t need much explanation. Everyone knows that college graduates earn more than high school dropouts. People who aren’t smart enough to do well on the SATs won’t get into college, and people who aren’t smart enough to read at grade level are more likely to drop out of high school in frustration. For readers looking for a more detailed examination of how low intelligence leads to poorer life outcomes, I recommend The Bell Curve by Herrnstein and Murray. It’s an excellent book that has been unfairly maligned, mostly by people who want to shoot the messenger. That said, it’s more of a sociology book rather than a scientific treatise on genes and intelligence, and Murray is often overeager to jump to conclusions, but nevertheless it’s an interesting and thought provoking book. (People who have been reading my blog for a while know that I’ve written many posts about how high intelligence isn’t as great a benefit as some think, but the point of those posts is not that intelligence doesn’t matter, but rather that low intelligence is a better predictor of poverty and other bad outcomes than high intelligence is a predictor of wealth and other good outcomes.)
I found a recipe that I am going to make for Ofir's work people. Or co-workers. Or whatever you call people your husband works with. I am going to whip them up tomorrow. I'll be sure to take a picture and show you. They are fantastically cute for the Christmas season.
One major change that would help connect people more to their political system – and in my opinion, thereby connect them more to all of the institutions in our lives – would be to create a compulsory voting system in this country. Compulsory (or mandatory) voting would be helpful, because not only would it push voting numbers up to more democratic levels (the mid-terms had a 37% voter participation rate – disgraceful), but would also re-engage citizens in the politics and political process. In addition, voter participation on the level that we’re seeing in the Australia (95%), which has a fine-based mandatory voting process, would help weed out extreme candidates, and stifle ascension of highly partisan groups such as the tea party from become major political forces.
If you look at Father Abraham, King David, Paul, Peter, they all faced different things.
Shallots, 3 pcs, cut into slices and deep fried
“s 92A - Internet service provider must have policy for terminating accounts of repeat infringers(1) An Internet service provider must adopt and reasonably implement a policy that provides for termination, in appropriate circumstances, of the account with that Internet service provider of a repeat infringer. (2) In subsection (1), repeat infringer means a person who repeatedly infringes the copyright in a work by using 1 or more of the Internet services of the Internet service provider to do a restricted act without the consent of the copyright owner”.
And I love the brilliant way Charlaine Harris has used Eric and Sookie to illustrate a very important principle of relationships that every couple deals with. Love is either enough, or it isn’t. You choose to be together, despite all the complications and conflicts or you part ways.
The Tribute I had been storing in my memory banks had a richly malty principle flavour theme with a complex citrus finish. But the Tribute that I've just rediscovered had a complex citrus principle flavour theme with a richly malty finish.
Her new brads and matching ribbon are adorable and fun to create with. Here's a look at some of the samples.
2. When I read Harry Potter, I seem to forget any other book (or just life in general), exists.
When the howl splutters into a whimper, the dog is dragged and kicked into a kennel to die alongside three others. It is a slow and painful death, the result of a botched lethal injection by a canine-killing squad.
The goal is simple – to get people excited about great writing. The philosophy is equally simple – there’s great writing out there you don’t know exists, and you should. Not by making it conform to the traditional preconceptions of what stories and books are, but by putting it out there in whatever shape it wants to take and selling the public a ringside seat.
This oversight didn’t interfere with the over all enjoyment of the story, but I can’t call it perfect, either. I can recommend it as a highly original story, though, and if you are a sci-fi fan I think that you will enjoy this one. Four Gerry Bees.
Three words used by residents of the Whiteaker neighborhood of Eugene, Oregon to describe the chronic drug problem that stymies their efforts at revamping their public image.
Disbanded empty handed from the quest
Picture: Bangalow's main street, Copyright Michael King-Prime
Before we begin, let's get one thing out of the way; what is the agency model? Here is a pretty down-to-earth definition by The Idea Logical Blog:
On two pieces of Cream CS, I stamped over them with Hero Arts "Italian Poetry" in "Peeled Paint" Distress Ink. I heat embossed them, then I embossed one with a Cuttlebug embossing folder. Then I used a Large Scalloped Spellbinder to cut out "windows" on it, then I stamped the Italian Poetry in Staz-On "Butter Cream" ink on clear acetate, attaching to the backside of the CS with the "windows". I used my EK Success "Dotted Lace" punch on some green CS, then I put popdots under the window CS and placed it over the first stamped CS base. I placed some glittery reindeer under the windows, for something to look at - LOL :) Then I added some lace, a Pendant and a Fancy Tag from Spellbinders. The hat pins are from Maya Road, and the flowers are from Prima. The sentiment is Stampin Up "Home For Christmas", stamped in Versafine "Sepia" ink.
Microphone in hand, the woman smiles and says in her booming voice, “Ladies and gentlemen, the NEW “New Tigallo” Champion!”
Fear is here within me and I still have so many walls I need to break down. I am working on it.
But, just as they are about to organise
I only recently gained access again to a computer. It's not mine, it's his. Mine still hasn't been decided on, because I am lame like that and since I now have this one to fall back on, I am hesitant to put my coin into the wrong equipment. I spent most of this year without a computer which is a bit like having an arm cut off if you use blogging as a form of therapy... but I found that I had much to focus on. More than anything over the past months I have been reminded of how blessed I am to live the life that I do with my family and friends in such a gorgeous and bountiful place. And how lucky I am to have two children to watch grow and learn from.
The short while I did have the mask on was very unpleasant. I don't think the serum is suitable for people with sensitive skin or broken skin (e.g. scratches, open wounds, acne) because it seriously STUNG! I've used a few other clay masks and serum masks before and usually they never make my skin sting in areas where I have pimple scars (where the skin is still healing and recovering). Subsequently, the same applies to the area around the eyes. Although the serum didn't actually get into my eye/s, my eyes started to sting (which is another reason why I took the mask off so soon).
As to the possibility of the Chief Executive validly and successfully nullifying the acts of the Legislature, to me that is quite remote, if not impossible. As already stated at the beginning of this opinion, the Chief Executive acting as an agent of the Legislative under his emergency powers, may not go against the wishes and policies of his principal. He can only carry out its wishes and policies, and where his acts and orders run counter to those of the Legislature, or operate on a field already withdrawn because the Legislature had already acted therein, his acts or Executive Orders must give way and will be declared void and of no effect, by the Courts, as we are doing with the Executive Orders involved in these cases.
This is another Saturated Canary image, isn't he sweet? The yummy papers are Bo Bunny and they have been distressed and inked with Vintage Photo Distress Ink.
Factoid: Wollstonecraft’s daughter is Mary Shelley of Frankenstein fame.
Heading down the shore this summer? Looking for a great boutique studio?
This might have the positive effect of making people think twice before pressing the send button on their e-mail messages, or posting some of the absolute drivel that turns up on social network sites, but it’s also an incredible invasion of privacy.
So fellow Baby Boomers out there on the blogosphere, on similar journeys, how do YOU sustain yourselves. Our tired, overworked, out of balance, sometimes at wits-end, precious selves in this foreign and daunting world of caregiving for an elder. I’d love to hear how you do it.
He makes like a bat outta hell
While commenting on Nifty Outlook for the next week, we maintain our views that markets may remain range bound but if fuel prices are hiked then it will be positive for oil and marketing companies. Markets would also be looking out for quarterly earnings from second week of April with IT major Infosys. As far as rupee movement is concerned, liquidity flow from FIIs as well as government borrowing plan would determine the rupee movement. So in the current scenario, we would continue to recommdnd bottoms up approach to accumulate stocks of companies having ethical management and attractive valuations across sectors like IT, Banking, Media, Logistics, Capital goods and infrastructure.
I haven't figured out how to discuss what's going on with The Geej, and I don't want her to see my fear when I DO talk to her about this.
We have a few FABULOUS sponsors this week !!
I had so much fun creating this Alien Love pendant! Not just because I found it funny and cute but because I pretty much made all the elements from scratch.
I felt everything. The waves of every sadness my family has ever known swelled up around me, their wet hands pulling and pushing.
Dies: Nestabilities (4" circle, 2.5" circle, 4" Scallop Circle, 2" x 4.25" rectangle, 2" x 4.25" Scallop Rectangle)
This card was for my hubbys 40th, didn`t quite turn out how I wanted it to look, but hubby had a chuckle and was pleased with it. The image is from bugaboo stamps and I coloured it in using my promarkers and used k&Co papers that were at the bottom of my stash box.
Not many people employ penmanship any more but I do have a friend who loves Victoria Magazine and all things quaint from writing her own letters to making seals for the envelopes. It really is a treat to receive a card or letter from her. And I will always miss those envelopes with my mother’s beautiful, flourishy handwriting on them.
These physicists have been my longtime benefactors, tolerating me as they have for decades as a regular observer of their weekly Physics Colloquium.
Jenny: "Here, Oliver. You get your own bowl and your own toys."
Voila !
“You invited him into the house of Jeeves Publishing & Sons & Illegitimate Sons!”
It is days of joy at seeing the first eyelash appear,
And just as suddenly, as from a cryptic signal
up in debt to someone. I dedicate this song to all the Taos County miners who lost their
One other special thing about the May Make and Take is that every single stamp set that I used on the projects we made are all retiring on May 30th. On this card we are saying Goodbye to Concord Crush, Precious Butterflies, Messages for Mom, Pear Pizzaz, and French Filigree.
The rather unexpected result was that zombies have been something of a theme in our lives and sprang naturally to mind this past spring when we were brainstorming names for our not-yet-purchased boat. With our plan for cruising in the Caribbean -- frequest destination for those Princess cruises -- Zombie Princess seemed apropos.
The variety Citra, with a alpha acid content between 10-12% and an oil content of 2-3 % originated from a cross between the female European noble aroma variety Hallertauer Mittelfrueh and a male that was derived from the variety known as U.S. Tettnanger. Citra is 50% Hallertauer mittelfrueh, 25% U.S. Tettnanger and the remaining 25% is East Kent Golding, Bavarian, Brewers Gold and other unknown hops. Citra has a special flavor and aroma that it imparts to beer. Depending on the brewing process and the hopping rate, the flavors and aromas of beers hopped with Citra might range from grapefruit to lime, melon, gooseberry, and lychee fruit.The Citras are only used in dry-hopping (the other hops are Magnum and Crystal). The "Torpedo" of the name is apparently a particular device the brewery uses to boost the extractione from the small amount of hops to which they have access:
when aimed my way:
The race has begun. There are only 38 days until Christmas. Which for a knitter or crocheter is NOT a lot of time, right?
He sends you abundant showers,
However, you should understand -- it’s not just about your family tree when we talk about genes.
I'm behind on some pressing maters here in town...but I wanted to pop in to say I miss you and I have a ton of shit to show you the first chance I get...
Remember when George W. Bush sent US soldiers into Darfur to stop the genocide taking place there? Remember how he was hounded from office afterwards? Oh, shit. He was re-elected. I guess that means he made the right decision (at least for a majority of US voters).
He concluded, “This is brutal stuff. This is heartless. This should not stand.”
Tangie: Journey12, AJC11 Parcel 30
“My mother’s looking after the kids on Saturday evening,” she said, casually dropping it into the conversation, as though her mother would quite often have the children to stay over for no particular reason.
Quality:
I play Duncan Mee’s co-worker and friend. Duncan is Benjamin’s older brother who is played by Thomas Haden Church. My character’s name is Ernesto and he is a tax accountant at H&R Block. That’s the closest I’ll ever get to doing my own taxes…hahaha.
RALPH TOWNER 12-string and classical guitars, piano on (3)
There's answers out there. ... I don't know what the answers are, but there are people who do. There are people that have the answers. We need to get the world involved. We need to find those people. We need to find that one person that can make a difference. And if we can't find that one, we're going to find 100,000 of them. And we're all going to put our heads together and we're going to come up with a solution ... if you really want to learn what suicide by bullying is all about, talk to the people who are living the nightmare. We haven't done Ty's last load of laundry, because it still smells like him. We haven't washed his sheets because I can go in there and lay on his bed and still smell my boy. You want to learn what bullying and suicide is all
Nothing is the same way it seems
one lemon zest
with King Alexander, no less.
"They never told us their names." I told the crater-faced interrogator for what must have been the fifteith time. Silently, I swore never to let another Celebrity Chef into our house ever again. Those guys were seriously bad news.
Now it was time to figure where I was going to hang it so I could paint it. Aaron came up with the idea of hanging it from a tree in our backyard. We happened to have a bird feeder hook and bungee cords on hand to aid in the hanging. Here's a full view of the chandelier but I was a little too excited and got my hands on some spray primer before getting a picture (you can see it on the chain and the side of the column).
threats
Norah Jones' new album, Little Broken Hearts, comes out May 1.
More Personally
Have you ever noticed that when anyone has a prophecy they make all the real action happen right in their own time? Wow, all those thousand year-old predictions just happen to be popping off next week, right before that trip to grandma's. Guess we don't have to kennel the dog after all. What a weird coincidence.
Don’t limit yourself.
I have changed allot of my vocal style since I began, mainly to push myself and to experiment. It was around a 2001 maybe 2002 I started experimenting but never had the push or confidence to do anything until 2005.
What grandparent (or parent) does not have photos of kids on the fridge? Why not organize them in this magnet tile design. It’s another great way to showcase all the important people in mom’s life. Start your own portrait set on Pinhole Press.
Three years before the US invasion of Afghanistan, in 1998, Osama bin Laden spoke of how successful Islamoterrorism had been. He said:
Now the salt tides seaward flow;
Carrie: “Um, I don’t do that.”
In The Lorax surveillance cameras are everywhere, making this the first cartoon that is as Orwellian as it is Seussian. Instead of The Cat in the Hat, there’s a robot tabby that keeps tabs on the innocent. (Its motto could be “I Can Spy All By Myself.”)
Salt: a pinch
I was helped into a quick shower and then tucked into bed. During the shower DH had done skin-to-skin time with the baby, and now it was time for the full newborn assessment – it was cool that DH got to weigh him, and he weighed in at a startling 9 lbs 5 oz!!
You now have a great PC, but are you prepared for the worst? Protect your investments, and invest on one of Apollo’s 550VA UPS. It’s better to be safe than sorry.
For Annual Subscription to the Online Version:
Ann Fessler interviewed 100 birth mothers and recorded their voice for the film. Each woman told a piece of their personal story in 30 second sound bytes. All the women together told a story of American society during the 1940′s-1970′s. When it came to sex before marriage and adoption, America failed millions of families, but we already knew that. At least there are people exposing the injustice now.
My friend was really delighted to eat here. She commented that it was a very satisfying meal!
Raising more eyebrows is the discovery that the so-called populous craze for Ayn Rand’s seminal work, Atlas Shrugged, is also being financed by a decidedly non-populist pact of deep-pocketed hedge fund operators.
08/10/2010 SELL 0.01 xauusd 1203.05 08/11/2010 1200.04 +3.01
624410 Child day care services
Eva Melas
Mission 'find pho in Yorkshire' arrived in Sheffield last Friday. Surely Pho 68 would come up trumps. The clue is in the name.
Some days are worse than others. There definitely are some really really hard days thrown in there.
Scouting the area around the pond and clearing finally reveals the spider’s lair. The trinkets found amidst the charnel of its past victims are poor consolation for the final discovery: the body of Elise. Callimachi sets about collecting stones for a cairn for the spider’s past victims while the others assess the beast’s horde.
It is so quiet with the exception of my sobbing and staggered breathing. It is getting so hard to breath, I heave on the floor, my snapped rib throbbing in pain and my eyes closed; waiting for his next move.
it’s not that simple
Excerpt: A protest demonstration by at least 20,000 people on the eve of Vladimir Putin's inauguration as president boiled into a battle with police after protesters tried to split off from the approved venue and march to the Kremlin. Club-wielding, helmeted officers seized demonstrators and hauled them to police vehicles, dragging some by the hair. Among those arrested were three of the leaders of the opposition movement that gained new life over the winter: Sergei Udaltsov, Alexei Navalny and Boris Nemtsov.
That is a phrase I hear a lot at home, usually from my youngest Son. “Ummmm…. Mrs. Go….I mean Mrs…..MOM!”
Nuts and seeds provide filling and energizing snacks. Pistachio nuts, in particular, are a good source of fibre, magnesium, copper and B vitamins. They can boost your immunity, and due to high levels of healthy monounsaturated fat (like olive oil) they can help prevent against heart disease.
Empanada is a very popular dish in Latin America and Spain. You make a dough and wrap meat and some vegetables with the dough and bake or fry them.
I am a happy Karen right now. I painted an actual object, and it turned out well! *grins*
In my ‘politically correct’ and over polite congregation (also prevalent in today’s society,) ‘No’ is a word we hate to use. We are uncomfortable with it. We push against it. We try to soften its harsh effect on the recipient; we pretend it’s really not a ‘No’; or we change our answer to ‘Maybe’ or just to not hurt the other’s feelings, our ‘No’ ends up – a ‘Yes’.
The poets, the liars
“Ricorditi di me, che son la Pia;
The second half of Alex
A few months later, I noticed bank fees being debited from my account. High bank fees. Fees that, when I signed up for the account, was told wouldn’t be so high. It turns out I was set up with the wrong account by the person at the (surprise, surprise) Yonge/Eglinton branch. Instead of dealing with the branch, I took to Twitter and reached out to the team there. Within a few hours, the fees were returned to my account and the account was changed to an unlimited debit use account. A win for the social media team once again.
That’s what we’ve come to. You are punished for believing in your kids’ self-reliance and the neighborhood you chose to raise them in. Hence, the Free-Range Kids movement. Hence this Free-Range Kids blog. Hence…I wish I knew. We have GOT to turn our country around or children will be prisoners of their parents, and vice versa, all in the name of “caring.” Ask me, that word is missing an “s” at the beginning. – L.
1. “While there is no simple solution out of this predicament that we have gotten ourselves into, there is a general direction in which we can start moving – one that respects the laws of nature, such as not taking more than the earth can provide or not producing more waste than the earth can absorb. Moving in a healthy direction requires us to operate in a positive spiritual way as well. This means treating others as we want to be treated, being compassionate and respectful, acting in service to the greater common good.”
I took Liam's hand and there was one point where we actually did get wet up to our waists but by then I honestly didn't care, I was soaked through anyway!!
A singular voice
60. Go to a concert
Our thoughts are with you.
that resilience
So let’s get started with some rather sinister stuff straight from Poland, the place that all god fear Icelanders fear to tread. Named after a brand of esoteric Jewish mysticism, MERKABAH are a 3 piece who’Ve been making some incredibly left-field space rock since 2007. Moments of free improv sax thrusts, mixed with heavy rock riffing and spacious space air. it’s the sort fo shit you want to play when you need to scare the neighbours into thinking that you’Re into some kind of death sex cult or something. For fans of the band Shining. Niiiiice!
samudra-nigrahādīni
Me: No Zach, it is way too hot
"new tracks!!" we would yell as we ran across our blank canvas, leaving our tiny marks.
Salvation Army Commissioner William Roberts, the charity’s national commander, wrote in the report that the increasing demand shows parents across the country are facing daily questions about how to provide for their children when even social service programs have to make cuts.
I said, “No, really, Miss. Now it’s Kate plus nine.”
We were given this hope when we were saved. (If we already have something, we don’t need to hopefor it. But if we look forward to something we don’t yet have, we must wait patiently and confidently.)
Janice is also worried about a meeting she has next Monday with a bunch of suits (school officials) regarding Tommy’s schooling. She’s afraid they are going to tell her that Tommy is no longer welcome at his school. I have to say that I suspect the same thing. His outbursts and behavioral issues are disrupting the entire class and he needs one-on-one supervision… sometimes even that is not enough. It’s not fair to the other kids or to the teachers. We understand that. But where will that leave Tommy? Or Janice’s job as a Paraprofessional for kids much like Tommy?
The avalanche of time,
The falafel I'm sharing with you today are made using chickpeas and stays crunchy for long time. Enjoy it!
In a homebirth, my baby has the greatest chance of a normal, physiological birth. This is his/her birthright. I will fight tooth and nail for that.
It was lovely, I ate a lot, felt my sister’s baby kick through her swollen belly, watched people I knew when I was young get yet another year older.
And with the recipe below a bit of sweet,spice and all things nice have been added – even a bit of fruity crunch.
06. Moglie Che Va... (01:47)
Also, this song/video/band is rad, one of my favourites.
I'll polish off the celebration with a few of our favorite children's books featuring pugs (though of course, none is as cute as Koko - who even made this week's "Pets on Furniture" feature by Kim on the addicting design blog Desire to Inspire).
Love and respect. My kids love and respect now, and I want them to continue into teenage years and adulthood. Love and respect goes a long way.
A source who wished not to be named told one of our correspondents that Jonathan was under pressure from his kinsmen not to budge on the issue.
I should have looked at Nordstrom and checked what the price was at their store,
-he’s too liberal,
greased & floured 9x13 baking pan. Bake in preheated 350 oven for 45-50 minutes until center
Seven years. That's how long this nightmarish morning routine has dragged on. With exceptions on the weekends, vacation time and summer break, every single morning I wake up and have to brace myself for the fight ahead. My other kids, all three of them, get up and get ready and go to school like they're supposed to. They do their homework, they get good grades, they follow the rules and do what they're told. But Charlie, he doesn't do what he's supposed to. I can't remember the last time we had a good conference, a good report card, a stretch of good mornings that lasted more than a week or so.
For years I would freak out over my belly, which at 185-200 lbs is usually able to sit against my thighs when I am seated. Even when I was ill, throwing up every day, unable to eat more than apple sauce and saltines for 30 days straight and had lost 40 lbs from the lack of anything but the barest sustenance I still had a little pouch of fat hanging beyond my stomach muscles. Especially when my cycle got going and I got bloated, I would have days when I was so uncomfortable in my own skin that i would literally tear my clothes off and freak out crying for hours.
The little wooden frame is truly that, a wooden frame. I was interested in miniatures for a time a while back, and made several doll houses. I found about 5 window frames last week while I was scrounging about, here and there, and figured, may as well use them here.
Daughter
There are many important messages behind this event. First and foremost, the clothing that the women wore to impersonate victims should be taken in a certain way.
In this day and age, there was no safe harbor. Nothing in which a sanctuary or paradise could be measured for the pitiful bands of humans against their human masters.
I buy groceries at Walmart
The speed of light within a fiberoptic cable is around 200,000km/s, and because the answer needs to come back too, this equals around 100km per msec. So if you multiply the y-axis by a hundred, you get a very rough measure of the distance of all authoritative servers queried. And servers are not distributed smoothly! They tend to cluster around hotspots.
I don't demand that I reach an ideal.
Poor motes sot wild in the breast,
Last would be the B-Meg. Powerade’s offense appears to be stagnant against the Llamados, who’s been playing with monkeys on their back. Finally, Yap and his comrades pulled it away, 4-5.
Atom Egoyan (The Sweet Hereafter)
So I will have to wait and see and I am sure it will mean more tests.....
A single block of 5 flats at Synge Place, in Dublin8 (central Dublin) with a max reserve of €425,000
What would any small boy do?
To take this analogy a step further, we can look again to the grace and eloquence of the butterfly and realize that our journey is our only guarantee. Our responsibility to make our way in faith, accept the change that comes, and emerge from our transitions as brilliantly as the butterfly.
What do you do when the stress levels rise? Does your body revolt and get sick?
The new global teams will be charged with innovation and identifying local trends that could have ramifications globally, as well as shepherding global campaigns. I've always wanted to shepherd a global campaign. Much less smelly than shepherding sheep.
After spending 8 months in prison for stabbing a dance teacher, Genshu returned to her life as a performer and began to challenge Japanese conventions by performing her dance routines in a kimono whilst wearing an oversized doll’s head. Across her life Genshu made public clams of racism towards Koreans in the aftermath of the atomic bombings of Japan and denounced Emperor Hirohito as a war criminal. The title comes from her famous quote “You mustn’t be eaten by the kimono. You must eat the kimono, and gobble it up.”
When I left school I was dead set on becoming a Lawyer, first I did a GCSE in Law (I got an ‘A’ for it) then I went on to do the Legal Executives Training course. The course was made difficult by teaching problems, and I complained about it in a local newspaper, which resulted in one tutor saying to me ‘You come from the wrong background to be studying law’ when I indicated maybe I should teach the class as she was so useless (oops!). My career plans were interrupted by my husband being diagnosed with a brain tumour, but when I eventually started going for interviews at Law firms I quickly decided I didn’t want to work with ‘these’ people (the lawyers). By now, although my family life (I was a full time carer) prevented me working in paid employment, I had already done a variety of voluntary work – Youth Work assistant, Charity Shop assistant, Teaching assistant in a primary school, Charity trustee and Charity fundraiser. I have always ‘thrown’ myself in 100% on everything I take on, but often taking on far more than one person should try to juggle at a time…
He screamed louder.
But Bong was really endeavor to show us the main things of Chicago in a "Hop on and hop off" sightseeing tour by car.
Based on the book The Long Walk: The True Story of a Trek to Freedom by Slavomir Rawicz
Ok the moment you've all been waiting for :::::::drumroll::::::: Here are the names of the eight winners of the Blook Tour! They will each receive a copy of Trish Berg's The Great American Supper Swap!
Since 2007 all discussions involving Dr Meltzer have ceased , many sites have stories on the glphs and all use parts of the story from different parts of the web , no new reaseach has taken place since.
Now that I've adjusted (more or less) to rising in the wee hours when our wee one is hungry, I find that the early morning is a fabulous time to cook. My husband also seems pretty happy about it. Last weekend, Saturday morning found me up at 5:30. With the sun just rising and cool temperatures, it seemed like the perfect time to make muffins.
We had the colours
Chris: They all say Hi back! There’s at least 38 of them in there – oh wait, 3 more just arrived!
There should be tissues on my desk ... but when I took this photo last night before going to bed my nose was not running like a tap ... why do colds always strike when you are asleep?!!!! Hubby is away on work for a couple of days ...so I have wallow in my own misery alone :(
And you wonder how he does it.
The Klannies will be in Austin on November 5th to rally in support of "traditional" marriage. November 5th is also my birthday, so they'd better be bringing presents. If not, I'll gladly accept their white sheets if they've got a decent thread count.
I am a critic. As such, I see my work as in many respects set apart from that of theorists and scholars (though it is of course frequently dependent upon them). The theorist and the scholar are unburdened of any necessity to engage intimately and on a personal basis with any specific work; they can hide behind their screens of theory and scholarship, they are not compelled to expose the personal nature of their work because they deal in facts, abstract ideas, and data. Any critic who is honest, however, is committed to self-exposure, a kind of public striptease: s/he must make clear that any authentic response to a work of art or entertainment is grounded not only in the work itself but in the critic's psychological makeup, personal history, values, prejudices, obsessions. Criticism arises out of an intense and intimate personal relationship between work and critic. If it is the critic's duty to strive for "objectivity" (in the negative sense of avoiding distortions), s/he knows that it is an objectivity that can never be fully achieved, because even when one is convinced that one "sees the work as it is," the relationship to it has still to be established. I have not the right to say, for example, "David Lynch makes bad movies": many people for whom I have great respect admire them, and they can certainly be defended on grounds of imagination, accomplishment, originality, strong personal commitment. I do, however, have the right to say, "I find Lynch's films extremely distasteful; my sense of value repudiates them."
It is difficult to put NAMA’s December 2010 figure in context – was €130m a “good” result for NAMA? The media would have you believe that developers were squirreling wealth away on an industrial scale, and that this malfeasance mostly involved putting property in the wife’s name (it is a feature of the Irish property world that developers are almost exclusively male). So €130m might be perceived as small in the context of loans for assets worth €74bn – surely borrowers of €74bn had at least a few billion of unencumbered assets to protect? And the view on here is that if developers who ran up debts of €74bn only managed to transfer €130m to their wives (or girlfriends or elsewhere beyond NAMA’s reach), then they were either too stupid to see the downturn coming or too honest to act so as to deprive creditors – neither seems likely, though there’s possibly a modicum of truth to both, so the implication is that spousal transfers should be far greater than €130m.
Because to tell you the truth when I leave here I’m GONE!
anyway, listen and tell me what he says.
Speaking of the romance, OH MY OH MY OH MY OH MY. Clare pulled my heart in, like, ten trillion and two different directions. My mental tug-of-war went a little something like this:
to reach out and shine
The organization's middle letters were switched recently - ND for "News Directors" became DN for "Digital News", in an effort to broaden and modernize the group.
So I browned my leftover chicken and bones with some sesame oil in my cast iron pot, added thinly sliced onions and chopped kimchi, and then covered it with water. Then I brought it to a boil and then let it simmer for over half an hour, then added a bit of fish sauce and scallions and allowed it to simmer for another 10-15 minutes.
For the record, Laura Bush was a teacher and librarian – which most people would describe as “grown up” jobs.
We, representatives of Palestinian civil society, call upon international civil society organizations and people of conscience all over the world to impose broad boycotts and implement divestment initiatives against Israel similar to those applied to South Africa in the apartheid era. We appeal to you to pressure your respective states to impose embargoes and sanctions against Israel. We also invite conscientious Israelis to support this Call, for the sake of justice and genuine peace.
To be a loyal subject is not a loss of personhood, but a glory. To affirm the monarchy is not a loss of dignity, but an affirmation of it.
and don't forget to take your winner's banner from the side bar.
Welcome any form of help, for helping is never a competition on who delievered much and who shared the best.
Thanks so much for looking! I hope you are able to play along :)
Thursday, October 4th–I went to therapy and watched “Across The Universe.”
Every spring and fall at Fashion Week, we're presented with future trends, and you can either be fashion's servant by updating now or you can be its victim by ignoring it completely. (More fool you.)
What is worse than an outfit of "double denim"? How about a couple all glammed out in nothing but a sea of denim blue??! (I have to admit, it's kinda cute that you like your guy so much you want to match him)
I was gifted this ring and I can honestly say I have been wearing it every single day since it arrived in the mail. I love rings and I am overly picky when it comes to finding ones I can wear day in and day out so I was so glad to receive this one. Simple, understated, and versatile. Perfect for everyday wear.
through his cross and blood and death.
This ornament was a step back, relax, and just follow directions type of ornament. I finished it in like 2 hours. The hardest part was deciding what colors to use.
Sierra Gorda Ecotours: Sierra Gorda Ecotours was created as a business for conservation whose objective is to promote the unique tourism opportunities of the Reserve within a network of eight locally-owned and operated eco-lodges and campgrounds. Sierra Gorda Ecotours creates sustainable livelihoods for the Reserve’s inhabitants through supporting small local handicraft businesses and eco-tourism establishments.
My answer to this question is that it depends on the publishing house/line you are writing for. Board books have fewer spreads than picture books, as a general rule - they will not be 32 pages. But I have seen them anywhere from 6 or 8 pages up to about 20. So go to your local library or bookstore and look at a selection of board books. Count the spreads/pages and make yourself a chart - for example, Little Simon's board books tend to be about 8 spreads/16 pages. This will help you on two levels: one, you will end up with a list of publishers who publish board books (many of them do not so it's important to know who does), and two, you will have a good idea of the length each publisher/imprint leans toward so you can appropriately target your manuscript.
It’s easy to get bored with side dishes because we get tired of eating the same old things, day after day. Keep things fun and interesting… MIX IT UP! So here’s a fun new side dish that’s healthy, easy, AND yummy!
“I was in a state of shock. I’d been told I would be allowed to compete regardless of the injury, but I guess when the doctor’s report came back it was a different story. It doesn’t matter. This is a road I’ve been down before. But I would have competed hurt – I’ve done that before too.”
At issue was a remark Patrick had made over wondering why the media, and the sports media in particular, always refer to female athletes as "sexy," and especially if they're competing in a sport traditionally dominated by men.
I honestly think that, if it weren't for my other kids, I'm not sure how I'd manage to go on living. This just hurts so bad.
Suzanne’s vanish like ghosts. It will be bedtime before I see them again.
President Obama: Loser
I started my March Momentum funnily enough on 1 March by upping my exercise which I will continue to do. I am confident of a loss next week as sometimes it takes 2 weeks for my body to realise oh she's actually taking this seriously again! I will never give up. No sorry. The dresses I spoke of last week in my post Dressgate, as suspected, did not fit. They are winging their way back to the shop.
I got you, God, and you are ALL I need!
General Richard E. Hawley, USAF (Ret.)
My mother said something that I want to share... "You can't put a bad apple in a bag with a few good apples and expect to pull out the good apples untouched by the bad!" She went on to say "Where blessed we got you back like we did!"
They united the left and liberals and Muslims against nationalists.
Little did I know that my parents were a part of the Great Migration that Wilkerson describes. The book reads like a great novel with beautiful language, interesting characters, and compelling stories. Wilkerson follows three Black Americans who left the South in the 30s,40s and 50s for what they believed would be better lives in New York, Chicago and Los Angeles. Though the stories are personal, they represent millions.
MEDITERRANEAN PITA FILLING
Price: $1.99
"A shoe tells who you are." Fergie
"You probably don't remember, but when you were little,
Maybe not with words
One of the features of our second visit to Japan, was hearing the caw of crows wherever we went. More often than not it was a single crow, its cry a haunting call echoing off grey stone and bare trees.
I have been waiting until I had a digital scrapbooking program to make a scrapbook for each year since I got married. As of yesterday, I am exactly 7 1/2 years behind! Yikes! I gotta get to work!
Here’s the other mountain of stuff that has to fit. The computer and electronics will carry on with me. I will also carry on the two small HB makeup bags because I really don’t want to have to replace any of that stuff last minute should something happen to my suitcase.
I thought I had uploaded some tracks from this a few years back but no sign of it in the old posts. So here is Side Two from a great LP on the Ace Of Hearts label from the 50's I would guess. Lots of old standard show tunes done in a lazy jazz tinged way only Peggy could sing them. No idea who's playing on this but some great musicianship throughout.
RV91, 93, 95 dress, top of shoes
We were meant to start this hard work during that session, however ended up talking about this new relationship of mine, and what exactly happened two months ago. I apparently gave her a very big scare. She told me she'd been very scared for me when she couldn't get trough to me at all - there was nothing there to get through to. She also had to check in with me how I felt about what had happened and how I would deal with it if I began to feel that way again. The only thing she wasn't too happy about was the fact I stopped taking my anti depressants cold turkey over a week ago. And yes I did end up having withdrawals where my legs were shaking and I felt dizzy. But it only lasted for half a day and then I felt great again. I sleep. Ok I'm down to the weight I was when I was discharged.. but umm I think falling in love does that to you :D it's not intentional. But Noel has decided I need some TLC and he loves cooking.. so this morning he made me breakfast.. he was meant to make me dinner yesterday but that sort of didn't go according to plan, we ran out of time :P
Reid: I will comment in six months when he is
Just my thoughts, daily life and so on, so forth.
But that notion leaves us with fossils for brains.
taken I am an instrument in the shape
We must walk for true Democracy, we must walk to correct a recalcitrant government. We must walk for CHANGE.
Gul Bashara, 11, cries out in pain while her mother and aunt move her to a wheelchair in the children’s ward. She was outside at home in Logar province with her brothers and sisters when a shell landed in the family’s garden. Seven children were injured and two were killed in the explosion. Gul Bashara’s spine was injured and she was paralyzed from the waist down. She also has severe flesh wounds to her arms, legs, back and chest.
Keeping my disaffection secret was harder than I thought. It meant I had to be one person on the outside while another person kicked and screamed on the inside. It meant there was something so shameful about my new spirituality that if I mentioned it to any of my Mormon friends, they’d immediately see me as an enemy and stop loving me.
The blackmail appears to have been:
“ANSWER THE DOOR, TIME IS NOT ON YOUR SIDE.”
I'm a klutz. I have five grandchildren. I love dogs.
A hand painting session with their mum was no different.
What's funnier than a pie in the sky? A pie in the face!
-Michael Mooney
Lunches - Tadziki Chicken Salad (Ckng Lght, May 2012), pita bread, fruit
JEWISH BIBLE
(These are collected in The Jennifer Morgue)
Timothy Grazioso, 42, Gulf Stream, Fla.
1/8 tablet of rennet dissolved in 1/8 c. purified water
At the Urban Meadow we are interested in all things having to do with the environment and gardening, so "DIRT! The Movie" is right up our alley. This documentary cleverly tells the story of that thin crust of earth we call dirt and which makes life on our planet possible. A humorous and touching complement to Al Gore's film "An Inconvenient Truth," DIRT brings us up close and makes us feel an affection for dirt and all the miraculous and beautiful things it brings to human life.
The weather has severely limited the sporting start of the term. Last Friday, however, 10 staff took part in a school golf tournament at Petersfield Golf Club. Using his local course knowledge, Alan Knight negotiated his way round the course expertly, and was the overall champion on the day, closely followed by Richard Lushington and Cliff Attwood. Chris Bott received the award for nearest the pin, with a great tee shot on the par 3 15th hole, whilst Alan Wright received the award for the longest drive on the 6th hole.
“In poverty and other misfortunes of life, true friends are a sure refuge.” Aristotle
In the dream, he appeared out of nowhere and started talking to me. We were in line at a concert, which was typically where we were throughout our relationship and subsequent friendship. I don’t remember much else, just that we were talking. It was awkward, but nice at the same time.
What you resist, persists. There is no point in locking horns and focussing on what we DON'T want.
Patrick Henry, 1792
In the Demjanjuk case, Israel was able to present enough evidence to gain Demjanjuk’s extradition. He was tried for the brutal murders of prisoners in 1942 and 1943.
Lesson to be learned…If the water tastes funny, don’t drink it. Sulfer is bad for you.
A = 6
The deeper that sorrow carves into your being, the more joy you can contain.
17 Jenna Gunson W Canyon Country, CA 12:58.5 40:18.53
Er, statistics? Where are they? Are you going to produce them? Eh?
Limitations & challenges abound. Life raises more questions than it answers. There will always be thorny, unsolved problems plus human tragedies that cannot be altered. My parents raised me to try a little harder, give a little more~but they did not raise me with trust in a more inclusive sense. We trusted each other, we 3. Maybe they knew that some "good" shadows cast a very wide, hole-filled, net. Pack your own parachute.
Ed Ward, writing in The New York Times in 1972, described the third Firesign album, “Don’t Crush That Dwarf, Hand Me the Pliers,” as “a mind-boggling sound drama” and a “work of almost Joycean complexity.”
“The Tuareg rebellion was only a sign of the depths to which Mali has fallen,” Konaté concludes. “The state of the Malian army is just that of Malian society. Consensus, which had been an asset in Mali — where ethnic groups got along fraternally — became a liability once it was hijacked by the politicians.”
I guess that’s all folks!
THE red rose whispers of passion,
UNITED NATIONS (AP) — Russia and China blocked US attempts to get the UN Security Council to condemn Sudanese government bombing and other military activities in the South Kordofan region of Sudan, UN diplomats said Friday. South Kordofan lies across …
(this first one is the actual song that came on. Haha, Oh Celine, you know I needed a corny song like this to get going!)
- I hate that we call it a war. It should not be two sides fighting against one another with the idea that one side will eventually win. This does not communicate the right kind of attitude we should be having about the subject, especially as Christians.
18 - I'm Sure To Fall
Oct 13 - Huckleberry’s Pizza Parlour - Rock Springs, IL
You cause the grass to grow for the livestock and plants for man to cultivate, that he may bring forth food from the earthand wine to gladden the heart of man, oil to make his face shine and bread to strengthen man's heart. Psalm 104:14-15
COVER FOR RING: With I hook and red yarn, ch 18, dc in 3rd ch from hook, dc in remaining ch sts. ch 3, turn.
Kory Stamper has already tackled this specific issue beautifully in her YouTube video from Merriam-Webster, but it still seems to be a gray area for most people. To recap her video in short form, octopuses is correct because when we take a word from a foreign language into English, we give it an English ending. Octopi is correct because grammarians, during a movement to simplify English, took a large number of words with “us” endings, including octopus, and gave them the Latin plural “I”. The only problem? Octopus isn’t Latin. It is Greek, which brings us to our last plural, octopodes, which is correct since it is a Greek word, so we give it the Greek ending.
This package contained two journals, Michael's and Jennifer's.
And I got to take this chap home.
The hawks’ bloodlust
A few comments, if I may.
That night, back in our hotbox apartment, trapped in the bedroom where we had the single window air conditioner, we lay in bed watching bad television, rushing out for a quick dip in the bathtub we had filled with cold water, and back atop the towels we spread out over the sheets. At 3am it was still 103 degrees out in the dark Tuscaloosa night, with two more months of summer stretching out before us, venomous. It was a very small room and that night the kitty brought a cockroach into bed as a prize between her teeth.
Happy or Moody most of the time: Moody :(
Anyways, this class will be on Tuesday, September 27 from 6-8pm at Scrapbook Buddies in Temple City. The cost is $12 and you can sign up over the phone by calling (626) 286-2846. You will need a basic tool kit (scissors, Scrappy Glue, and distressing ink). If you can't make it to the class you can always call and reserve a kit that will include a picture and directions (if necessary).
My sister came from Pennsylvania to visit for the weekend
The moving snake on the Pyramid is an annual reminder of a conjunction of the zenith sun with the Pleiades over Chichen Itza, but this is an event which will only occur during a 72-year time window, from 1976 to 2048. Right at the centre of this time window is the year 2012, when the Great Cycle ends. On May 20 2012, the zenith passage combines with a solar eclipse, on the Tzolkin day 10 Chichan, which means serpent. The winter solstice end-point will be 4 Ahau in the Tzolkin calendar, meaning Lord/Sun, and 3 Kankin in the Haab calendar, which means ‘snake-day’.
The article goes on to say Nas Malik has been accused of bullying, intimidation and sexual harassment and increasing his own salary and benefit package without any openness or transparency and more in an internal AWEMA report which concluded with legal advice there was enough evidence of financial foul play to pass the details to South Wales police’s economic crime Unit.
This is my latest mixed media collage. I'm moving back into my home studio due to some major unhappiness with the way the management (or should I say, mis-management) of the artist organization I'm involved with. That's all I'll say about it right now. For me, the making of art is important. This quasi political brew ha ha is just a bump in the road. Since the physical/emotional disruption, I've been unable to make art in my downtown studio. Thus, I've been making collage work at home, like crazy. I guess I should thank those who have had 'control' over my (and other artists) destiny these past months. The anger I feel has pushed me onward and upward. In other words, thanks, now get out of my way.
2010.08.25 Afghanistan Badghis 3 0 Two Spanish soldiers training local cops are shot to death along with their translator by their driver.
Turns out, it takes virtually no time to sort through underwear drawers. I don’t have to try them on to see if they will fit like I do with the clothes in my closet. A quick glance at each pair makes sorting easy. And there is no question of whether or not to donate these undies to a thrift store. That can’t happen, right? People know not to do that, right?
A walk through the Opryland Hotel is not to be missed either. Trust me when I tell you that just a walk through this Hotel is a grand experience. And, if you’re fortunate enough to be there at Christmas time, well, you’re fortunate enough!
From local wine and art to putt-putt and candle-dipping, the Piggly Wiggly Country Village is rapidly becoming the hub of the Midlands. The hustle and bustle of this ever-expanding centre does detract a little from the rustic country feel on which this famed KZN tourist route was founded, however, if shopping malls are your thing, then this is the closest you’ll get to one on the Meander.
Our hotel, the El Jardin, was a series of rooms built into the hillside. We had reserved the ‘house,’ a two bedroom, two story, wooden building that had a playhouse feel. Nick and I took the upstairs bedroom which had a deck and hammock overlooking the ocean. The pool was two-stories; a smaller pool that had a waterfall leading into the lower. This, I think, is the only reason we survived. Beer by the pool at peak heat and post hike was exactly what we needed. Necessary, I would say.
1. Birth Of Earth (3:01)
Sleeping beauty nods her head
What I would say about Original Source, is if you are a fan of a particular scent – stock up! As their products are largely seasonal, they have a tendency to disappear on occasions, as I found out with some of my lost loves – goji berry and mallow, chocolate mint, and Australian berry. Seriously, these products will not break the bank, and they are often on special purchase in supermarkets or pharmacies. My strawberry shower gel was buy one get one free, and at two quid a bottle of course I got four!
Thanksgiving this year was the worst of my life. It should have been happy, I should have had Aidan with me, but instead Andrew and I spent it apart. Him in St. Louis and I in Oklahoma. Both my and Andrew's Thanksgivings were equally horrible. I got to listen to my family talk about my cousin's kids and all that they have been up to, including stories about her baby boy who was born a month after I had Aidan (like I really needed those anecdotes) and Andrew got to listen to all kinds of baby talk because his sister is pregnant and is due in January. I think that Andrew and I would both agree that we would have rather been in our own house maintaining a solid and sustainable drunk for all of the Thanksgiving weekend. I'm just glad that neither of us actually acted on our inner thoughts and no one got Bitch Slapped or severely tongue lashed.
I use the tips below to help me spend more time with family and friends, instead of being stuck in the kitchen, missing all of the fun.
These are some photos I’ve taken when I volunteered to sit at my daughter’s school during the absence of the main teacher on her leave.
coaching a young string quartet. Rehearsals are also featured
On Tuesday, S&P left 20 other banks unchanged and actually increased the ratings on two Chinese firms, the China Construction Bank and the Bank of China. But for most financial institutions in the US and Europe, it has been tough sledding this year. “Bank of America is a microcosm of the crisis of confidence in the industry — in the numbers, the managers and the regulators,” said Mike Mayo, a banking analyst with Crédit Agricole. Bank of America is not alone in watching its stock price fall. Shares of Goldman Sachs have dropped more than 47% so far this year. Its stock closed Tuesday at $88.81.
Ah, the cellar. Back at the cabin, Marty dares Jules to make out with the mounted head of a wolf. Jules works that wolf’s head with enough abandon it creeps a few of her friends out, but her display is to help illustrate how the technicians rig the game by pumping chemicals into the cabin to enhance emotions. Dana is up next and everyone knows she’s going to take Truth because she’s too inhibited to see any Dare through. At that moment, the technicians decide to pop open the door to the cellar, and Curt dares her to go down there.
I have my students write one summary blog post including hyperlinks to everything they have done for that period of time. For the eighth grade portfolio, we do have printed copies of many items that they save to use as reference during high school. (A sample MLA paper, instructions on creating MLA papers, proofreaders marks, etc. as well as their best of work.)
Perhaps not so strangely enough, I gotta admit that I admire Derbyshire in my own cockeyed way for coming out and saying a lotta the same things that the likes of Buchanan and Goad have been writing for years, only being lucky enough to get some national attention and scrutiny because of it while rankling the ire of more'n a few Mike and Gloria Stivics. But as far as defending him...well, if you do want to read a defense of Derbyshire's piece this entry to the Taki site by Paul Gottfried, a man whom I agree with almost all of the time, does tend to put the hoards of the more unreasonable detractors and trolls in their place. Thomas Fleming's own take on the situation via the CHRONICLES website was yet another wowzer even if it didn't quite dwell on the contents of the article, more or less attacking NR who really have nothing left to stand on now that the libertarians, paleocons, Birchers and other evil beings have been stricken from their hallowed pages. And of course. Derbyshire's own response was refreshing if only because he certainly wasn't doing any public boo-hooing or backtracking in order to appease the typical mainstream pundits who certainly like to have their moral superiority stroked! And it ain't like he's gonna get his old job back (not that I think he actually wants it!).
That wraps up my tour of Mobile. I also saw loads of great places on the Gulf coast- you Florida beach ladies are quite fortunate!! I hope y'all are safe and warm and had a wonderful weekend!
c) Repeating the gossip would harm someone, to no purpose, therefore I shall not repeat the gossip.
is the vision of that Heaven of which
Kumari is also noted for her signature and iconic, monumental public art sculptures – the giant bronze chilli-pepper, Pedas Pedas (2006) was commissioned by and installed at the National Museum of Singapore, the Saga (2007) at the North Arrival Hall in Changi Airport Terminal 3, Singapore and most recently, the Nutmeg (2009) at the newly opened ION Orchard, Singapore and Wild Chilli Couple (2010) for GTower, Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia.
Be sure to link up and leave a comment below.
With this regard their currents turn awry,
Jackson is slowly learning how to save for things that he wants. It goes against his nature, but he's learning that saving can be rewarding. He recently saved up for an iPod. It took him a year to save enough, but he managed. What can help your teens (and even younger kids) save is a chart. When charities do fundraisers, they set their goals and draw a chart that they color in as their funds get higher and higher. It's nice to have that visual reminder of how far you've come and how much farther you have to go in order to reach your savings goal. My teens like going online and seeing how much they're accumulating on their PASS cards. It's a convenient way to keep track and have that visual reminder of how much is being saved.
The final factor was the issue of our goalies. Almunia had an on and off season. Fabianski’s blooper against Porto will definitely rank among the top 20 howlers of all time.
Other Updates:
With the #14 choice, the St. Louis Rams selected LSU defensive tackle Michael Brockers. At #15 the Seahawks made perhaps the biggest reach of the round by selcting West Virginia linebacker Bruce Irvin. The New York Jets failed to listen to their fans who were chanting Melvin Ingram’s name. They instead chose Quintin Coples from North Carolina with the #16 pick. #17 pick Dre Kirkpatrick, selected by Cincinnati was the 3rd Alabama player taken in the first round. At #18 the San Diego Chargers nabbed a steal by taking South Carolina defensive end Melvin Ingram. He should instantly bolster their pass rush and should’ve been a top ten pick. With the #19 pick Chicago chose Boise State linebacker Shea McClellin.
Okay friends, y'all asked for them so here they are!
Claude Debussy wrote Syrinx for solo flute in 1913. The original Syrinx, for anyone who doesn't know, was a nymph in classical mythology.Pursued by the amorous god Pan, she found herself on a riverbank. She asked for the assistance of the river nymphs, who obliged by turning her into hollow reeds that made a haunting sound when the breath of the frustrated god blew across them...
older son attends for kindergarten. We cross one street, and then the last
There is, indeed, another and a better path: that of becoming a member of human community, and, with the help of a technique guided by science, going over to attack against nature and subjecting her to human will.
Drain the tuna. Transfer to a bowl and flake into pieces with your hands. With a fork mix in the beaten eggs, garlic, shallots, tomatoes, parsley, 2 tsp olive oil, bread crumbs. Season with salt and pepper.
Then, the little creativity angel in my head gave me a nudge.
Yet, I liked him. Here's the catch: He asked me out up front for Wednesday lunch and Friday night if I liked him after the lunch. I agreed. We had the lunch. I was attracted to him. Basically all we talked about was his contracting work (sadly, I know far too much about the renovation business). It went well. Then nothing. No response when I followed up to ask if we're on for Friday.
I can fit Pynchon
I screamed so loudly I woke up all three of my sleeping children. (Waking children during nap-time is a mortal sin and I've almost popped a cap in the UPS man for ringing my doorbell before. Even though he was bringing me magical under-eye makeup from Sephora.) I ran screaming through my yard to my neighbor's house and almost gave her heart attack.
Behind her, men spoke in urgent tones, too. Her brother sounded even more irate than he had when they first discovered the bride was missing.
This sentence is a general indicator of my reaction towards the episode as a whole. Some things happened here and there, but the overall impression that I got is that The Animation Studio Everyone is Talking About is totally on the ball this week. The majority of the other blogs totally disagree with me, and even their respective comments are totally divided as well. To not sound too divisive on the subject, I assure that my general indicator was felt by the majority of viewers, so that my taste in anime is very agreeable.
11) Remove from oven and allow to cool completely, then cut or make shapes like I tried to the first time. LOL
Bryson remains perplexed by the defensiveness. "It's like session beer is a threat of some kind to the extreme beer guys," he says. "Well, bite me. I want my choice, too."
so do not despise the discipline of the Almighty.” – Job 5:4-17 NIV
With temperature hitting 38 and above degree Celsius is not freaking good and in fact, it is probably the hottest summer that we ever had. I just can't bear the heat at all and it was like I want to take a shower every now and then just to freshen myself up. Oh well, I don't know if i can relate it to the so called global warming or I am taking it exaggeratedly but comparing this year's summer to the previous ones, this is definitely unusual. It burns my skin and I can't even go outside for awhile. I don't think hitting the beach is good enough to keep myself from this horrible summer condition.
We went straight to the Blood Bank.
Next to the New Brewery comes the Old Brewery, and lastly the Model Brewery, which seems a mere toy compared with the others. It is used chiefly for experiments, and for occasional brews of stout and porter. The firm also possesses extensive maltings, and, it is almost needless to say, large cooperages, stables, &c.
Yesterday I stayed busy in the morning doing stuff around the campground but my knees fussed a bit in the afternoon, so the afternoon went a little slower when I stay in the office more. I finally went back out and work some more and by the end of the day my knees where not to happy but it sure make the day go faster. Today we will see how it goes. I think the weather is warming up and things are slowing down a little. Maybe yesterday was the start of that ………… as the snowbirds start their fight north. I will see how things are going next weekend. It is this time of year that I always see things go slower here.
Episode 1 Body and Soul
Friday’s times are 7:27 pm for the moon & 8:46 pm for the sun. (79 minutes)
Later that night, Nicole says she gathered up the courage to sit down and write an email to Andrew expressing that she wanted absolutely nothing to do with him. She sent the following email:
A friend recently recommended to me the film Agora (2009). I had a hard time getting into it at first, but I am glad I persevered to the end. Set in Alexandria, Egypt in the fourth century, it tells the true story of female philosopher and mathematician Hypatia (played by Rachel Weisz). Hypatia had the misfortune to live in a world in which Christianity was quickly becoming the dominant religion due to Emperor Constantine’s conversion. Egypt was a Roman province at the time and Alexandria was a gem in Rome’s crown. Philosophy, schools of thought, astronomy, polytheism, and paganism were widespread in the important maritime port of Alexandria until Constantine issued some edicts that quickly brought about some changes.
walks along the Grand Union Canal, while London Walks offers guided tours exploring the whole area. If you really want to see canal living first hand, you can take a narrowboat trip down the canal towards Camden. The boat is indeed as the name suggests – no wider than seven feet in order to navigate the canals of Britain and Wales.
I've got to admit, I've never understood the whole brouhaha up in Collin County where the outgoing DA and judges spent their final months in office taking turns getting one another indicted, but several items I read today helped somewhat clear up the bizarre and murky picture. Here's Ed Housewright at the Dallas News framing the story with a journalist's faux balance. More probative, IMO, were attorney Hunter Biederman's excellent offerings at the blog Collin County Observer and on Biederman's own blog, Frisco DWI Lawyer, including juicy links to primary documents. MORE: From the Dallas Observer.
Of his theory of the flood, which he thought was being accepted, Isaac Vail wrote:
I followed her basic idea for how to make the necklace, but I used different beads and made the necklace in one piece rather than making a separate loop with the beads. What do you think? I'm really loving it. I'm really into the whole southwestern kick right now, and I feel like this necklace will be the perfect accessory for my outfits that fit that theme.
(Has anyone else noticed that this series puts anything remotely connected to a holiday or special month about as far from that time of year as possible? Perfect story for Columbus Day? Let's put it in the Spring! *soapbox off*)
The thought of trading a young, emerging star pitcher like Pineda was certainly hard for a lot of Mariners fans to take. Even here in the Rainiers front office, a lot of employees were not happy to see Pineda go.*
The last couple of days the number of people reading this blog has increased very much.
"Applied theater," as the organizers of Safe in This Place practice it, is built on the traditions of community-based theater and political theater in the United States and drama-in-education in the UK, and has an ongoing relationship with Theater of the Oppressed as developed in Brazil by Augusto Boal. As they put it, "we believe in engagement and reciprocal learning rather than coming into a neighborhood and telling people what the answer is to their problems." Examples of their work and the work of their colleagues include the Bar None Theater Project, which created original theater in a women's prison, and the St. Vincent's Theater Project, which addressed the closing of St. Vincent's in the Village. To develop a project like Safe in This Place, they conduct significant background research into the history and current state of the neighborhood (in this case, the space in which they live), including meeting with community groups, surveying local residents, and generally engaging with what's written and spoken about the area.
Did you do something special to celebrate Mother's Day?
The report and various additional charts outline the different offices involved in Iran's weapons program and identify some 60 directors and experts working in various parts of SPND and 11 additional institutions and companies affiliated with the program.
Jerome: “And built a tower therein,” that is, the Temple, of which it is said by Micah, “And thou, O cloudy tower of the daughter of Sion.”
Looking at the possible matters for consideration just now, the normal position applies – namely that it is very difficult to establish perjury to obtain a conviction.
100% Michigan football, baseball and basketball players! This was a great assortment of Tom Brady, Braylon Edwards, Rich Hill and many more. Thanks, Tim! Hopefully your lot lives up to these lofty standards (and includes enough hilarious names to satisfy you).
I'm really just writing this out to make sure I've got it all down.
Well, if you think about it the union is simply an extension of the New World order taking its lead from the controllers who manage world affairs. They set up Europe for total control by the commission in Brussels and the commission themselves are controlled in the process.
And if you start that debate, then how much of any photograph is the photographer? Isn't the film, the camera itself, and the processing always going to be in the middle? Even photojournalists use angles and lighting to convey moods and instruct feelings. Does that mean their images are any less important, or that there's distance between you and the subject?
All the pain and mess and rubbish that we've had to deal with and yet, there was still an undeniable pull. Neither of us unable to let go of. Slowly, slowly we began to assess the damage. Look to the future.
5. Tell Diego to go on a Diet Coke run.
A group of Crown Heights residents who are inspired by the Occupy Wall Street movement have come together to work towards a more socially, environmentally, and economically just Crown Heights. We are working with community organizations to build on the momentum of the Occupy movement and solve some of the most pressing issues in our neighborhood. Some of the issue areas we have been discussing so far include:
-Rouge River (Oregon, Cow)
Hat tip: Norm Geras (btw, Norm’s wife, Adèle, has a new book out, Made In Heaven. It’s her 91st book, for heaven’s sake. Conscience to Dymphna: think of that next time you’re whining about being behind in your posting, Dymphna dear.)
in short protecting the old feudal monopolies and the paternalism that went with them, the AWL are characterised by their defence of the bureaucratic, 'feudal', state capitalist monopolies, and the paternalism that goes with them.
Some people don’t like poetry because it’s confusing. Do these same people, I wonder, find it confusing to be still and quiet? Allowing ourselves to fully explore and experience the white space of poetry and of our own lives means exploring and experiencing ourselves. Such exploration is often difficult – shameful, embarrassing, uncomfortable. Such exploration, however, can truly be marvelous – soothing, revelatory, affirming. In poetry – which I feel is just another form of storytelling – we can find the comfort of knowing we’re not alone. And in the white spaces we can breathe in that knowledge that we’re not alone, we’re not lost.
Orthodox church.
Orchid plants will dress up a tabletop or window. Several orchid plants together give a splash of interesting color and shapes. Orchids have the unwarranted reputation of being difficult to grow, but in truth, they are not fussy at all. In fact, the very adaptability that has allowed them to colonize all corners of the earth has made them very forgiving and rewarding in cultivation.
A peculiar effect is that the European Union and associated countries usually seek to speak in unified statements delivered by the current EU chairmanship. That is supposed to increase the impact made, but in practice that single statement tends to be quite toothless and drowned out by the myriad of other voices present, while also erasing the natural diversity of the European countries. For good or ill, this gives even more scope for NGOs to speak their opinions — an opportunity to be used, or important things will remain unsaid.
No little white lies can be spoken
FLOOR CLEANER – tiles, vinyl or laminate
The soup is so thick with collagen that if you do leave the soup unattended for a period of time, it will develop a skin. You will also find the soup steadily absorbed by the noodles, plumping them into thicker and fatter strands.
All in all, although the meal cost us about RM550 for 8 persons (a bit expensive), but we all were satisfied with the meal. This is a restaurant which you should visit at least once if you are craving for Chinese cuisine.
The rules say to work as much as you can. Hurt yourself. Push until you can't see straight. Take all the overtime you can get. Never, ever say no. And for the most part I agree with this ethos. But the truth is that cooks are for shit when it comes to taking care of themselves. Stand on your feet, running around for 12 hours a day, sweating through your shirt. Tear your body down...then reward it by filling it with beers, whiskey, burgers, and cigarettes. When was the last time you saw your grill guy eating a salad at the end of the shift? How many cokes does your fry guy suck down on a Friday? When was the last time you actually ate 3 normal meals in a day? Shit, when was the last time you exercised?
Basically I figured I needed a good plan for inventory reduction this month and also a good excuse to post some good beer pics and some nice glassware. But mainly, I'm looking forward to some awesome beers.
Days/Hours: negotiable
Just when the listening books were lost, spellbound by the story, the clunk and grind of security grilles, the bleeps of touch-pad codes cut through mid-sentence, mid-phrase, even mid-word. The sudden slam of covers was always like a spear through their shocked paper hearts.
2. Tim/SpastikMooss of the Great Sports Name HOF finally gets the package I owe him sent his way. I found a few great sports names, including one of his favorites (God Shamgod) in a '97-'98 Fleer set, and I threw in a couple relics because those are always useful (note to Tim: I don't think Cliff Floyd has a particularly great sports name, unless you count the fact that he shares a first name with Bill Cosby's best character, and you know, with the hippin' and hoppin' and bippin' and boppin', the kids don't know what the jazz...is all about!
Engine
So, when I came face-to-face with the new Gü display of chocolate brownies, chocolate mousse and chocolate melting cakes where my preferred brand of yogurt used to be at the grocery store, it didn't take me too long to figure out their target market. Women!
I bring up the issue about TABC stomping in our backyard. I mention that this is crap and they should be letting us know when they are in our city. I have a big issue with this also because normally the TABC officers are old short computer geek looking officers. I’m worried that they are going to talk to the wrong drunk or a fight breaks out and they will (let me repeat WILL) get here asses whooped. This is our bar if there is an issue we can handle it. Someone brings up that they did inform us but someone leaked it out. I was actually in shock that TABC informed us of anything. A couple of the officers on my shift were like “what they were sharing information”? They didn’t share that with our shift we all say. The brass and day time losers leave.
Each one of us has the authority to rebuke the devil himself. It isn’t that we lack authority to command evil from our lives in Jesus’ name, but that we lack faith that we are given such authority. It is a supernatural proxy given us by Almighty God, not because we have the strength, but because His strength is manifest in our fidgety, messy weakness. Believe it, like a child; with passion and expectation.
Previously, on Lost....I mean Good Burp. "Brandon gives up beer in an attempt to loose weight after he made a stupid bet with his friend Schlampe." (It sounds a lot more cool if you imagine it in that deep, ominous voice like the Lost dude. Or if it was Waylen Jennings telling you as I attempted to jump a creek in the General Lee).
WHAT a week.
DCP Tun Hisan said police were looking for the mastermind.
And the people who will suffer the most are those who are closest to the bottom time and time again.
Considering what I know now, I had little to be confident about ( ._.) and yet.. I had friends. It is the doing of the Lord!
